Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
OREGON PUBLIC SAFETY COORDINATION GRANT PROGRAM
(General Provisions)
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Public Safety Coordination Grant Program is  established
within the  Oregon Criminal Justice Commission to support the coordination of local public
safety policy with the goal of reducing individuals’ involvement with the  criminal justice
system.
(2) The Oregon Public Safety Coordination Grant Program consists of grants awarded to
counties by the commission in the following program areas:
(a) The Justice Reinvestment  Program described in section 53, chapter 649, Oregon Laws
2013;
(b) The Oregon Treatment Court Grant Program established under section  21 of this 2025
Act;
(c) The Oregon Behavioral Health Deflection  Program established under section 76,
chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024;
(d) The Improving  People’s Access to Community-based Treatment, Supports and Ser-
vices Program established in ORS 430.231; and
(e) Any other grant programs administered by the commission that provide  funding
consistent with the goals described in this section.
(3) If any of  the program areas listed in subsection (2) of this section include eligible
applicants other than counties:
(a) Grants may not be awarded to those entities using  the procedures described in this
section.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 1
(b) The commission shall, prior to releasing a solicitation for applications under  the
Oregon Public Safety Coordination Grant Program, select  the proportion of funds to be set
aside for noncounty applicants.
(4) An application for a grant under this section must:
(a) Be submitted by a local public safety coordinating council convened  under ORS
423.560;
(b) Include a biennial public safety plan that describes each county’s approach to,  and
defining goals for, reducing individuals’ involvement with the criminal justice system;
(c) Include a list of budget allocations that indicates how state and other funds  are used
to sustain the biennial public safety plan;
(d) Indicate each program area listed in subsection (2)  of this section for which a county
is seeking funding;
(e) Include a description of how each selected program area  is incorporated in the
county’s biennial public safety plan and administered in accordance with  standards and best
practices; and
(f) Include any elements required  by statute or rule for each program area listed in
subsection (2) of this section for which a county is seeking funding.
(5)(a) Grants awarded under this section must be used to support local programming that
adheres to a recipient’s biennial public safety plan and to standards  or best practices estab-
lished for any selected program area listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Prior  to soliciting grants under this section, the commission shall consult with one
to three individuals with expertise in the relevant  fields of each program area listed in sub-
section (2)  of this section to inform the development of criteria or metrics to ensure local
programs that are funded adhere to standards or best practices.
(6)(a) During a grant application  period established by the commission, the proportion
of grant  funds available to each county shall be determined in accordance with the statutory
requirements for each program area listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Eligibility criteria, funding priorities and permitted uses of funds  established by
statute for each program area listed in subsection (2) of this section  apply to grants to
counties under this section.
(7)(a) The commission shall adopt rules to administer the Oregon Public  Safety Coordi-
nation Grant Program. At a minimum, the rules must include:
(A) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants;
(B) A process for distributing any unallocated funds;
(C) A process for evaluating the efficacy of programs funded by the Oregon Public  Safety
Coordination Grant Program;
(D) Provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant awards; and
(E) Provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between counties.
(b) For grants in program areas listed in subsection (2) of this  section for which entities
other than counties may apply, any rules adopted by the commission pursuant to  the statute
establishing the specific program area shall  govern the grant application and award process
for noncounty applicants.
(c) For county applicants, any rules adopted by the commission pursuant to  the statute
establishing the specific program area, including rules  establishing definitions or relating to
eligibility criteria, funding priorities  and permitted uses of funds, generally apply unless in
conflict with this section or a rule adopted pursuant to this section.
(8) Counties may request up to 10 percent of program funds for administrative costs.
(9)(a) At the conclusion of the grant application period, the  commission shall award
Oregon Public Safety Coordination Grant Program funds in accordance with rules  adopted
by the commission.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 2
(b) Within one year of awarding  grant funds, the commission shall evaluate each grant
recipient’s progress related to the biennial public safety plan and  defined goals therein and
communicate the results of these evaluations to the recipients.
(c) Before the conclusion of a biennial grant cycle, the commission  shall engage in a final
performance evaluation of grant recipients.
(d) A county that has demonstrated adherence to the county’s  public safety plan and to
applicable standards and best practices, met  or exceeded defined public safety plan goals and
avoided state costs related to public  safety, as measured by a final performance evaluation
completed by the  commission, is eligible to receive supplemental funding from the funds ap-
portioned under section 53 (2)(b), chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, as follows:
(A) The proportion of  funds available to a county under this paragraph shall be deter-
mined in accordance with the formula used to distribute baseline funding under ORS 423.483.
(B) If fewer than 36 counties qualify for  the receipt of supplemental funding under this
paragraph, the funds that remain shall be redistributed to qualifying counties.
(10) As used in this section, “administrative costs” means all costs incurred in  the ad-
ministration of the  Oregon Public Safety Coordination Grant Program that are not directly
related to the delivery of program services or projects.
(Justice Reinvestment Program)
SECTION 2. Section 52, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is repealed.
SECTION 3.  Section 53, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, as  amended by section 54, chapter 649,
Oregon Laws 2013, section 1, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2019, and section 18, chapter  78, Oregon
Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 53.  (1)(a) [ In consultation with the Justice  Reinvestment Grant Review Committee established
under subsection (2) of this section, ] The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall administer  the
Justice Reinvestment Program described in this section[ . From funds appropriated to the commission
for purposes  of the program, the commission shall ] to  award grants to counties that establish a
process to assess [ offenders] individuals involved in the criminal justice  system  and provide a
continuum of community-based sanctions, services and  programs that are designed to reduce
recidivism and decrease the county’s utilization of imprisonment in a Department  of Corrections
institution while protecting public safety and holding [ offenders] such individuals accountable.
(b) As part of the  program described in this section, the commission shall additionally
make grants  to counties for programs that are designed to reduce recidivism and substance
use disorders and that are  guided by evidence-based and, if applicable, tribal-based practices,
risk and clinical assessment  tools or other research-based considerations. The grants may
be used to provide supplemental funding for:
(A) The operation of local jails;
(B) Appropriate treatment  services for persons with substance use disorder who are on
probation, parole or post-prison supervision; or
(C) The intensive  supervision of persons with substance use disorder who are on pro-
bation, parole or post-prison supervision, including the incarceration of  persons with sub-
stance use disorder who have violated the  terms and conditions of probation, parole or
post-prison supervision.
(c) The commission shall  further establish a program to award supplemental grant funds
to counties for downward departure prison diversion programs as part  of the program de-
scribed in this section. The commission shall use any moneys appropriated to the commis-
sion for the supplemental grant program described in this paragraph,  including any moneys
appropriated to or deposited in  the Oregon Public Safety Fund established under section 4
of this 2025 Act for grants described in this paragraph, to award  supplemental grant funds
for downward departure prison diversion programs to counties selected  by the commission
to receive the funds.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 3
(2) Funding available to the Justice  Reinvestment Program, including funds described in
subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section, shall be apportioned in the following order:
[(b)] (a) [Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, ] No less than 10 percent of grant funds
awarded under this section must be distributed to community-based  nonprofit organizations that
provide services to victims of crime, with priority given to  culturally specific organizations and
culturally responsive services.
(b) No less  than 15 percent of grant funds shall be retained by the commission for the
purpose of funding local public safety priorities  and awarded to grant recipients who meet
the goals described in section 1 (9)(d) of this 2025 Act.
(c) Remaining  funds shall be apportioned in accordance with the formula used to dis-
tribute baseline funding under ORS 423.483.
(d) The commission may retain up to three percent of the funds described in paragraph
(c) of this subsection to  support analysis or evaluation of outcome measures related to public
safety in this state.
[(2) The Justice Reinvestment Grant Review Committee is  established, consisting of the following
members:]
[(a) The Governor shall appoint the following seven members: ]
[(A) One member shall be a district attorney. ]
[(B) One member shall be a county sheriff. ]
[(C) One member shall be a chief of police. ]
[(D) One member shall be a county commissioner. ]
[(E) One member shall be a community corrections director who is not a sheriff. ]
[(F) Two members shall be representatives of community-based organizations that provide services
for underserved racial, ethnic or minority communities. ]
[(b) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint one nonvoting member who is a judge. ]
[(c) The President of the Senate shall appoint two nonvoting members from  among members of the
Senate.]
[(d) The Speaker of the House  of Representatives shall appoint two nonvoting members from among
members of the House of Representatives. ]
[(3)(a) A majority of the voting members of the committee constitutes a quorum for the  transaction
of business. ]
[(b) The committee shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson. ]
[(c) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appointment to
become effective immediately. ]
[(d) The committee shall meet at times and places specified  by the call of the chairperson or a
majority of the voting members of the committee. ]
[(e) Legislative members of  the committee shall be entitled to payment of compensation and expenses
under ORS 171.072, payable from funds appropriated to the Legislative Assembly. ]
[(4)(a) An application  for a grant described in this section must be submitted by a local public
safety coordinating council convened under ORS 423.560. ]
[(b) The grant application must include a statement of commitment, from the  relevant stakeholders
of the service or program for which the county is requesting funding and including the district attorney,
presiding judge and community corrections director, to reduce recidivism and  decrease the county’s
utilization of imprisonment in Department of Corrections facilities while protecting public  safety and
holding offenders accountable. ]
[(5)(a) During a grant application period established by the  commission, the proportion of grant
funds available to each county shall be determined in accordance with the  formula used to distribute
baseline funding under ORS 423.483. ]
[(b) At the conclusion of the  grant application period, the commission shall award grants in ac-
cordance with rules adopted by the  commission. If unallocated funds remain at the conclusion of the
grant acceptance period, the commission may establish  a supplemental grant period and distribute the
unallocated funds. ]
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 4
[(6)(a)] (3)(a)  The commission shall regularly evaluate  the community-based sanctions, services
and programs funded under this section. The commission shall specifically assess :
(A) The  extent to which each county is reducing utilization of imprisonment in Department of
Corrections facilities by offenders  convicted of felonies under ORS 137.717, 475.752 to 475.980,
811.182, 813.010 or 813.011; and
(B) The extent to  which each county is reducing recidivism by offenders convicted of
felonies under ORS 137.717, 475.752 to 475.980, 811.182, 813.010 or 813.011 .
(b) The commission shall  [report] make the results of an evaluation conducted under this section
[to a committee of the Legislative  Assembly related to the judiciary ] available to the public in a clear
and accessible format, either in a report or on the website of the commission .
[(7)(a) Before applying  for grant funds to administer a community-based program described in
subsection (10)(a)(D) of this section, the county must obtain the consent of the presiding judge  of the
judicial district in which the county is located. ]
[(b) A grant application to administer a community-based program  described in subsection
(10)(a)(D) of this section must include the costs of appointed counsel. ]
[(8) After consulting with the Justice Reinvestment Grant Review Committee, the  commission shall
adopt rules to administer the Justice Reinvestment Program. The rules must include: ]
[(a) A methodology for reviewing  and approving grant applications and distributing grant funds.
Rules described in this  paragraph must provide the Justice Reinvestment Grant Review Committee with
the ability to approve grant applications for submission for final approval by the  commission. The
commission may either approve the grant application  or return the application for reconsideration by
the committee.]
[(b) A process for evaluating the efficacy of community-based  sanctions, services and programs
funded under this section. ]
[(c) A requirement that  the grant review committee consider, when approving grant applications,
each county’s historical reduction of utilization  of imprisonment in Department of Corrections facilities
by offenders convicted of felonies under ORS 137.717, 475.752 to 475.980, 811.182, 813.010 or 813.011. ]
[(d) Provisions allowing the grant review committee to submit to the  commission, and the commis-
sion to approve, provisional funding plans for counties applying for grants under this section. ]
[(9)(a) If a  county does not reduce utilization of imprisonment in Department of Corrections facili-
ties by offenders convicted of felonies under ORS 137.717,  475.752 to 475.980, 811.182, 813.010 or
813.011, upon request of the grant review committee, the commission shall decline to grant the full grant
amount requested by a county, provide technical assistance, withhold approved grant funds or terminate
further distribution of the grant award. ]
[(b) If  the commission takes an action described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, any remaining
moneys may be redistributed  by the commission through a supplemental grant program. Priority shall
be given to counties funding  programs for historically underserved communities including rural com-
munities, racial, ethnic and minority  communities and tribal communities. Rural counties may apply for
supplemental grants in cooperation with other rural counties. ]
(4) The commission may adopt rules to administer the Justice Reinvestment  Program,
including:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants;
(b) A process for distributing  any unallocated funds, with priority given to counties
funding programs for historically underserved communities including  rural communities,
racial, ethnic and minority communities and tribal communities;
(c) A process for  evaluating the efficacy of community-based sanctions, services and
programs funded under this section;
(d) Provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant awards; and
(e) Provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between applicants.
[(10)] (5) As used in this section:
[(a) “Community-based program” includes: ]
[(A) Work release programs; ]
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 5
[(B) Structured, transitional leave programs; ]
[(C) Evidence-based programs  designed to reduce recidivism that include the balanced adminis-
tration of sanctions, supervision and treatment; ]
[(D) Administering a reentry court under section 29, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013; and ]
[(E) Specialty courts aimed at medium-risk and high-risk offenders. ]
[(b) “County” includes a regional collection of counties. ]
[(c)] (a)  “Culturally responsive  service” means a service that is respectful of, and relevant to,
the beliefs, practices, cultures and linguistic needs of diverse consumer or  client populations and
communities whose members identify as having particular cultural or linguistic affiliations  by virtue
of their place of birth, ancestry or ethnic origin,  religion, preferred language or language spoken
at home. A culturally  responsive service has the capacity to respond to the issues of diverse com-
munities and require knowledge and  capacity at systemic, organizational, professional and individual
levels of intervention.
[(d)] (b)  “Culturally specific organization” means an organization, or  a program within an or-
ganization, that serves a particular cultural  community, that is primarily staffed and led by members
of that community and that demonstrates self-advocacy, positive cultural identity and intimate
knowledge of the lived experience of the community, including but not limited to:
(A) The impact of structural and individual racism or discrimination on the community;
(B) Specific disparities in access to services and resources experienced by the community; and
(C) Community strengths, cultural practices, beliefs and traditions.
(c) “Intensive supervision” means the active monitoring of  a person’s performance in a
treatment program by a parole and  probation officer and the imposition of sanctions, or re-
quest to a court  for sanctions, if the person fails to abide by the terms and conditions of the
treatment program.
SECTION 3a.
If House Bill 2632 becomes law, section 12, chapter 151, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 2632) (amending section 53, chapter 649, Oregon  Laws 2013), is repealed.
SECTION 4. The Oregon Public Safety Fund is established in the State Treasury,  sepa-
rate and distinct from the General Fund. All moneys  in the fund are continuously appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of section 53, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013.
SECTION 4a.
 Section 4 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  The Oregon Public Safety Fund is established  in the State Treasury, separate and dis-
tinct from the General Fund. All moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission for  the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 53, chapter
649, Oregon Laws 2013 , and section 1 (9)(d) of this 2025 Act .
SECTION 4b. The amendments to section 4 of this 2025 Act by section 4a of this  2025 Act
become operative on July 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. Section 56, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section 19, chapter
78, Oregon Laws 2022, and section 1, chapter 572, Oregon Laws 2023, is repealed.
SECTION 6. (1) Sections 4 and 5, chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2018, are repealed.
(2) Section 7, chapter  98, Oregon Laws 2018, as amended by section 21, chapter 78, Oregon
Laws 2022, and section 2, chapter 572, Oregon Laws 2023, is repealed.
SECTION 7. Any funds appropriated to  the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission for the
supplemental grant program described in section 5, chapter  98, Oregon Laws 2018, that are
remaining on July 1, 2026, shall be  deposited in the Oregon Public Safety Fund established
under section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(Oregon Behavioral Health Deflection Program)
SECTION 8.  Section 76, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 76.  (1) As used in this section, “deflection program” means a  collaborative program be-
tween law enforcement agencies and behavioral  health entities  or community-based social service
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 6
organizations that assists individuals who may have substance use disorder, another behavioral
health disorder or co-occurring disorders,  and  who often have other service needs,  to create
community-based pathways  to treatment, recovery support services, housing, case management or
other services.
(2) The Oregon Behavioral Health  Deflection Program is established within the [ Improving
People’s Access to Community-based Treatment, Supports and Services  Grant Review Committee es-
tablished under ORS 430.234 ] Oregon Criminal Justice Commission . The program consists of
grants awarded by the [ committee] commission  to counties and federally  recognized tribal govern-
ments to fund deflection programs.
[(3)(a)] (3) The purpose of the program described in this section is to:
[(A)] (a)  Address the need for more deflection programs to assist individuals whose behavioral
health conditions, including substance use disorder,  and other service needs  lead to  a heightened
likelihood of interactions  with law enforcement, incarceration, conviction and other engagement
with the criminal justice system.
[(B)] (b)  Track and  report data concerning deflection program outcomes in order to determine
the best practices for deflection programs within this state.
[(b) ORS 430.230 to 430.236 do not apply to the program described in this section. ]
(4)(a) The [ committee] commission  shall develop a  grant application process for awarding grants
under this section.
(b) An application for a grant under this section may be submitted by a county or [ the] designee
of a county, [ or by ] a tribal  government or designee of a tribal government  or a consortium con-
sisting of two or more counties  or tribal governments, or designee of a consortium . Only one
application per county  or tribal government  may be submitted, but  the application may request
funding multiple programs within [ a county ] an applicant’s jurisdiction .
(c) Prior to submitting an application for a grant under this section, the  applicant shall coordi-
nate with all partners of the development and administration of the proposed deflection program to
ensure that the partners have  the resources necessary to implement the deflection program[ .] as
follows:
(A) For a county or county consortium applicant,  the partners shall include at least a dis-
trict attorney, a law enforcement agency, a community mental  health program established under
ORS 430.620 and a provider from a Behavioral  Health Resource Network established under ORS
430.389. Partners may also include a  treatment provider, a local mental health authority, a tribal
government, a peer support organization, a court or a local government body.
(B) For  a tribal government or tribal government consortium applicant, the partners
shall include at least a law enforcement agency and either  a behavioral health entity or a
community-based social service organization.
(d) An application for a grant under this section must contain:
(A) A description of the  coordination with program partners required by paragraph (c) of this
subsection that has occurred;
(B) A description of the individuals who would be eligible for the program and what  qualifies
as a successful outcome, formulated in cooperation with the program partners described  in para-
graph (c) of this subsection;
(C) For a county or county consortium applicant,  a description of how the program for which
the applicant is  seeking funding is culturally and linguistically responsive, trauma-informed and
evidence-based;
(D) For a county or  county consortium applicant,  a description of a plan to address language
access barriers when communicating program  referral options and program procedures to non-
English speaking individuals; and
(E) A description of  how the program coordinator will communicate with program partners
concerning persons participating in the program and  any other matter necessary for the adminis-
tration of the program.
(5) To be eligible for funding under this section, a deflection program:
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 7
(a) Must be coordinated by or in consultation with  a community mental health program, a local
mental health authority or a federally recognized tribal government;
(b) Must have a coordinator with the following program coordinator duties:
(A) Convening deflection program partners as needed for the operation of the program;
(B) Managing grant program funds awarded under this section; and
(C) Tracking and reporting data required by  the [ Oregon Criminal Justice ] commission under
section 37 , [ of this 2024 Act ] chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024 ;
(c) Must involve the partners described in subsection (4)(c) of this section; and
(d) May involve a partnership with one or more of the following entities:
(A) A first responder agency other than a law enforcement agency;
(B) A community provider;
(C) A treatment provider;
(D) A community-based organization;
(E) A case management provider;
(F) A recovery support services provider; or
(G) Any other individual or  entity deemed necessary by the program coordinator to carry out
the purposes of the deflection program, including  individuals with lived experience with substance
use disorder, a behavioral health disorder or co-occurring disorders.
[(6) During a grant application period  established by the committee, the maximum proportion of
grant funds available to an applicant shall be determined as follows: ]
[(a) The proportion of grant funds available to an applicant other than a tribal government shall
be determined based  on the county formula share employed by the Oversight and Accountability
Council established under ORS 430.388, but an applicant may not receive less than $150,000. ]
[(b) The committee shall determine the proportion of funds available to  an applicant that is a
federally recognized tribal government. ]
(6)(a) The commission shall distribute moneys in  the Oregon Behavioral Health De-
flection Program Account established under  section 78, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, as
follows:
(A) The commission shall first determine the proportion of funds  available to an appli-
cant that is a  federally recognized tribal government or a consortium of federally recognized
tribal governments.
(B) Following  the determination made under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the
remaining moneys shall be distributed to other applicants as follows:
(i) Twenty-five percent of the moneys shall be distributed to counties based on the county
formula share used for the program during the biennium ending June 30, 2025;
(ii) Seventy percent of the moneys shall be distributed  to counties based on the formula
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(iii) Three percent of the moneys shall be retained by  the commission to support grant
recipient data collection and analysis or evaluation of outcome measures; and
(iv) Two percent of the moneys shall be retained by  the commission to support technical
assistance for grant recipients.
(C) Each qualifying county applicant shall receive  a grant award of no less than $300,000.
(b) For purposes of the distribution under paragraph (a)(B)(ii) of this subsection:
(A) The commission shall provide historical data  to each applicant to assist applicants in
developing a program population projection.
(B) Applicants shall develop a program population projection  to submit to the commis-
sion. The program population projection shall consist of:
(i) A projection of individuals eligible for deflection based on local program criteria;
(ii) A projection of individuals  to be enrolled in the Oregon Behavioral Health Deflection
Program within the applicant’s local jurisdiction; and
(iii) An explanation describing the  methodology used to calculate the program population
projection.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 8
(C) The proportion of funds available to  an applicant shall be determined by the com-
mission using the combined projections of  potential populations served by the Oregon Be-
havioral Health Deflection Program.
(7)(a) Grant funds awarded under this section may be used for:
(A) Deflection program expenses , including but not limited to law enforcement employees,  dep-
uty district attorneys  and behavioral health , [ treatment] case management or outreach  workers,
including peer navigators and mobile crisis and support services workers.
(B) Behavioral health workforce development.
(C) Capital construction of behavioral health treatment infrastructure.
(D) The payment of restitution to a victim, if potential or outstanding restitution is a
barrier to program participation.
(E) The purchase of closed-loop referral technology to facilitate referrals  to local part-
ners and community-based organizations involved  in supporting deflection and jail reentry
programs.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the [ committee] commission may award
planning grants for the development of deflection programs.
[(c) The committee may allocate up to three  percent of program funds to support grantee data col-
lection and analysis or evaluation of outcome measures. ]
(c) A county or county consortium applicant may request up to  10 percent of program
funds for  administrative costs. A tribal government or tribal government consortium appli-
cant may request up to the federally negotiated indirect cost rate for the applicant to cover
administrative costs.
(8) The [ Oregon Criminal Justice ] commission shall provide staff support to the grant program.
(9) The  [ committee and the ] commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this
section[ .], including:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants;
(b) A process for distributing any unallocated funds;
(c) A process for evaluating the efficacy of deflection programs funded under this section;
(d) Provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant awards; and
(e) Provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between applicants.
(10) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Successful outcome” means an outcome that recognizes  that recovery pathways are
necessarily individual and that is measured in  engagement in case management services and
improvements in quality of life stability factors and public safety.
(b) “Victim” has the meaning given that term in ORS 131.007.
SECTION 8a.
If Senate Bill 610 becomes law, section  8, chapter 292, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 610) (amending section 76, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024), is repealed.
SECTION 8b. If Senate Bill 236 becomes law, section 8 of this 2025 Act (amending section
76, chapter 70, Oregon Laws  2024) is repealed and section 76, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024,
as amended by section 27, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 236),  is
amended to read:
Sec. 76.  (1) As used in this section, “deflection program” means a  collaborative program be-
tween law enforcement agencies and behavioral  health entities or community-based social service
organizations that assists individuals who may have substance use disorder, another behavioral
health disorder or co-occurring disorders,  and  who often have other service needs,  to create
community-based pathways  to treatment, recovery support services, housing, case management or
other services.
(2) The Oregon Behavioral Health Deflection Program is  established within the [ Improving
People’s Access to Community-based Treatment,  Supports and Services Grant Review Committee es-
tablished under ORS 430.234 ] Oregon Criminal Justice Commission . The program consists of
grants awarded by the  [ committee] commission  to counties and federally recognized tribal govern-
ments to fund deflection programs.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 9
[(3)(a)] (3) The purpose of the program described in this section is to:
[(A)] (a)  Address the need for more deflection programs to assist individuals whose behavioral
health conditions, including substance use disorder,  and other service needs  lead to  a heightened
likelihood of interactions  with law enforcement, incarceration, conviction and other engagement
with the criminal justice system.
[(B)] (b)  Track and  report data concerning deflection program outcomes in order to determine
the best practices for deflection programs within this state.
[(b) ORS 430.230 to 430.236 do not apply to the program described in this section. ]
(4)(a) The [ committee] commission  shall develop a  grant application process for awarding grants
under this section.
(b) An application for a grant under this section may be submitted by a county or [ the] designee
of a county, [ or by ] a tribal  government or designee of a tribal government  or a consortium con-
sisting of two or more counties  or tribal governments, or designee of a consortium . Only one
application per county  or tribal government  may be submitted, but  the application may request
funding multiple programs within [ a county ] an applicant’s jurisdiction .
(c) Prior to submitting an application for a grant under this section, the  applicant shall coordi-
nate with all partners of the development and administration of the proposed deflection program to
ensure that the partners have  the resources necessary to implement the deflection program[ .] as
follows:
(A) For a county or county consortium applicant,  the partners shall include at least a dis-
trict attorney, a law enforcement agency, a community mental  health program established under
ORS 430.620 and a provider from a Behavioral  Health Resource Network established under ORS
430.389. Partners may also include a  treatment provider, a local mental health authority, a tribal
government, a peer support organization, a court or a local government body.
(B) For  a tribal government or tribal government consortium applicant, the partners
shall include at least a law enforcement agency and either  a behavioral health entity or a
community-based social service organization.
(d) An application for a grant under this section must contain:
(A) A description of the  coordination with program partners required by paragraph (c) of this
subsection that has occurred;
(B) A description of the individuals who would be eligible for the program and what  qualifies
as a successful outcome, formulated in cooperation with the program partners described  in para-
graph (c) of this subsection;
(C) For a county or county consortium applicant,  a description of how the program for which
the applicant is  seeking funding is culturally and linguistically responsive, trauma-informed and
evidence-based;
(D) For a county or  county consortium applicant,  a description of a plan to address language
access barriers when communicating program  referral options and program procedures to non-
English speaking individuals; and
(E) A description of  how the program coordinator will communicate with program partners
concerning persons participating in the program and  any other matter necessary for the adminis-
tration of the program.
(5) To be eligible for funding under this section, a deflection program:
(a) Must be coordinated by or in consultation with  a community mental health program, a local
mental health authority or a federally recognized tribal government;
(b) Must have a coordinator with the following program coordinator duties:
(A) Convening deflection program partners as needed for the operation of the program;
(B) Managing grant program funds awarded under this section; and
(C) Tracking and reporting data required by  the [ Oregon Criminal Justice ] commission under
section 37, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024;
(c) Must involve the partners described in subsection (4)(c) of this section; and
(d) May involve a partnership with one or more of the following entities:
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 10
(A) A first responder agency other than a law enforcement agency;
(B) A community provider;
(C) A treatment provider;
(D) A community-based organization;
(E) A case management provider;
(F) A recovery support services provider; or
(G) Any other individual or entity deemed necessary by the program  coordinator to carry out
the purposes of the deflection program, including  individuals with lived experience with substance
use disorder, a behavioral health disorder or co-occurring disorders.
[(6) During a grant application period established by the  committee, the maximum proportion of
grant funds available to an applicant shall be determined as follows: ]
[(a) The proportion of grant funds available to an applicant other than a tribal government shall
be determined  by a formula established by the commission, but an applicant may not receive less than
$150,000.]
[(b) The committee shall determine the  proportion of funds available to an applicant that is a
federally recognized tribal government. ]
(6)(a) The commission shall distribute moneys  in the Oregon Behavioral Health De-
flection Program Account established under section 78, chapter 70,  Oregon Laws 2024, as
follows:
(A) The commission shall first  determine the proportion of funds available to an appli-
cant that is a  federally recognized tribal government or a consortium of federally recognized
tribal governments.
(B) Following the determination made under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph,  the
remaining moneys shall be distributed to other applicants as follows:
(i) Twenty-five percent of the moneys shall be distributed to counties based on the county
formula share used for the program during the biennium ending June 30, 2025;
(ii) Seventy percent of the moneys shall  be distributed to counties based on the formula
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(iii) Three percent of the moneys  shall be retained by the commission to support grant
recipient data collection and analysis or evaluation of outcome measures; and
(iv) Two percent of the moneys shall be retained by  the commission to support technical
assistance for grant recipients.
(C) Each qualifying county applicant shall receive  a grant award of no less than $300,000.
(b) For purposes of the distribution under paragraph (a)(B)(ii) of this subsection:
(A) The commission shall provide historical data  to each applicant to assist applicants in
developing a program population projection.
(B) Applicants shall develop a program  population projection to submit to the commis-
sion. The program population projection shall consist of:
(i) A projection of individuals eligible for deflection based on local program criteria;
(ii) A projection of individuals to be enrolled in the  Oregon Behavioral Health Deflection
Program within the applicant’s local jurisdiction; and
(iii) An explanation describing the  methodology used to calculate the program population
projection.
(C) The proportion of funds available to an applicant  shall be determined by the com-
mission using the combined projections of potential populations  served by the Oregon Be-
havioral Health Deflection Program.
(7)(a) Grant funds awarded under this section may be used for:
(A) Deflection program expenses , including but not limited to law enforcement employees,  dep-
uty district attorneys  and behavioral health , [ treatment] case management or outreach  workers,
including peer navigators and mobile crisis and support services workers.
(B) Behavioral health workforce development.
(C) Capital construction of behavioral health treatment infrastructure.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 11
(D) The payment of restitution to a victim, if potential or outstanding restitution is a
barrier to program participation.
(E) The purchase of  closed-loop referral technology to facilitate referrals to local part-
ners and community-based organizations involved in supporting  deflection and jail reentry
programs.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the [ committee] commission  may award
planning grants for the development of deflection programs.
[(c) The committee may allocate up to three percent of  program funds to support grantee data col-
lection and analysis or evaluation of outcome measures. ]
(c) A county or county  consortium applicant may request up to 10 percent of program
funds for administrative costs. A tribal government or tribal government consortium  appli-
cant may request up to the federally negotiated indirect cost rate for the applicant to cover
administrative costs.
(8) The [ Oregon Criminal Justice ] commission shall provide staff support to the grant program.
(9) The [ committee and the ] commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of  this
section[ .], including:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants;
(b) A process for distributing any unallocated funds;
(c) A process for evaluating the efficacy of deflection programs funded under this section;
(d) Provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant awards; and
(e) Provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between applicants.
(10) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Successful outcome” means an outcome that recognizes  that recovery pathways are
necessarily individual and that is measured in  engagement in case management services and
improvements in quality of life stability factors and public safety.
(b) “Victim” has the meaning given that term in ORS 131.007.
SECTION 9.
 Section 76, chapter 70,  Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 8 of this 2025
Act, is amended to read:
Sec. 76.  (1) As  used in this section, “deflection program” means a collaborative program be-
tween law enforcement agencies and behavioral  health entities or community-based social service
organizations that assists individuals who may have  substance use disorder, another behavioral
health disorder or co-occurring disorders, and who often have other service needs,  to create
community-based pathways  to treatment, recovery support services, housing, case management or
other services.
(2) The Oregon Behavioral Health Deflection Program  is established within the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission. The program consists of  grants awarded by the commission to counties and
federally recognized tribal governments to fund deflection programs.
(3) The purpose of the program described in this section is to:
(a) Address the need for more deflection  programs to assist individuals whose behavioral health
conditions, including substance use disorder, and other service needs  lead to a heightened likelihood
of interactions with law  enforcement, incarceration, conviction and other engagement with the
criminal justice system.
(b) Track and report data concerning deflection program outcomes in order to determine the
best practices for deflection programs within this state.
(4)(a) The commission shall develop a grant application process for  awarding grants under this
section.
(b) An application for a grant under this section may be submitted by a county or designee  of
a county, a tribal government or designee of a tribal government or a consortium  consisting of two
or more counties or tribal  governments, or designee of a consortium. Only one application per
county or tribal government may be submitted, but the  application may request funding multiple
programs within an applicant’s jurisdiction.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 12
(c) Prior to submitting  an application for a grant under this section, the applicant shall coordi-
nate with all partners of the development and administration of the proposed deflection program to
ensure that the partners have the resources necessary to implement the deflection program  as fol-
lows:
(A) For a county or county  consortium applicant, the partners shall include at least a district
attorney, a law enforcement agency,  a community mental health program established under ORS
430.620 and a provider from a Behavioral Health Resource Network established  under ORS 430.389.
Partners may also include a treatment provider, a local mental health  authority, a tribal govern-
ment, a peer support organization, a court or a local government body.
(B) For a tribal government or tribal  government consortium applicant, the partners shall in-
clude at least a law enforcement agency and either a behavioral health entity or  a community-based
social service organization.
(d) An application for a grant under this section must contain:
(A) A description of the coordination with program partners required by  paragraph (c) of this
subsection that has occurred;
(B) A  description of the individuals who would be eligible for the program and what qualifies
as a successful  outcome, formulated in cooperation with the program partners described in para-
graph (c) of this subsection;
(C) For a county or  county consortium applicant, a description of how the program for which
the applicant is  seeking funding is culturally and linguistically responsive, trauma-informed and
evidence-based;
(D) For a county or county consortium applicant, a description of a plan to address language
access barriers when communicating program referral options and  program procedures to non-
English speaking individuals; and
(E) A description of how the program coordinator will communicate  with program partners
concerning persons participating in the program and any  other matter necessary for the adminis-
tration of the program.
(5) To be eligible for funding under this section, a deflection program:
(a) Must be coordinated by or in consultation with  a community mental health program, a local
mental health authority or a federally recognized tribal government;
(b) Must have a coordinator with the following program coordinator duties:
(A) Convening deflection program partners as needed for the operation of the program;
(B) Managing grant program funds awarded under this section; and
(C) Tracking and reporting data required by the commission  under section 37, chapter 70,
Oregon Laws 2024;
(c) Must involve the partners described in subsection (4)(c) of this section; and
(d) May involve a partnership with one or more of the following entities:
(A) A first responder agency other than a law enforcement agency;
(B) A community provider;
(C) A treatment provider;
(D) A community-based organization;
(E) A case management provider;
(F) A recovery support services provider; or
(G) Any other individual or entity deemed necessary by the program  coordinator to carry out
the purposes of the deflection program, including  individuals with lived experience with substance
use disorder, a behavioral health disorder or co-occurring disorders.
(6)(a) The commission shall distribute moneys in the Oregon Behavioral  Health Deflection Pro-
gram Account established under section 78, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, as follows:
(A) The commission shall first determine the  proportion of funds available to an applicant that
is a federally recognized tribal government or  a consortium of federally recognized tribal govern-
ments.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 13
(B) Following the determination made under subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph, the remaining
moneys shall be distributed to other applicants as follows:
(i) Twenty-five percent of the moneys shall  be distributed to counties [ based on the county for-
mula share used  for the program during the biennium ending June 30, 2025 ] based on the formula
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection ;
(ii) Seventy percent of the moneys shall be distributed to  counties based on [ the formula de-
scribed in paragraph (b) of this subsection ] a competitive grant program adopted by  the com-
mission by rule and following the priorities described in paragraph (c) of this subsection ;
(iii) Three percent  of the moneys shall be retained by the commission to support grant recipient
data collection and analysis or evaluation of outcome measures; and
(iv) Two percent of  the moneys shall be retained by the commission to support technical as-
sistance for grant recipients.
[(C) Each qualifying county applicant shall receive a grant award of no less than $300,000. ]
(b) For purposes of the distribution under paragraph [ (a)(B)(ii)] (a)(B)(i)  of this subsection:
(A) The commission shall provide historical  data to each applicant to assist applicants in de-
veloping a program population projection.
(B) Applicants shall develop a program population projection  to submit to the commission. The
program population projection shall consist of:
(i) A projection of individuals eligible for deflection based on local program criteria;
(ii) A projection of individuals to be enrolled in the Oregon Behavioral  Health Deflection Pro-
gram within the applicant’s local jurisdiction; and
(iii) An explanation describing  the methodology used to calculate the program population
projection.
(C) The proportion of funds available to an applicant shall be determined  by the commission
using the combined projections of potential populations served by  the Oregon Behavioral Health
Deflection Program , but a qualifying applicant may not receive less than $150,000 .
(c) The commission shall prioritize the following when awarding grants  under paragraph
(a)(B)(ii) of this subsection:
(A) Grant recipients making adequate progress toward meeting program population
projections submitted to the commission under paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(B) Programs designed to minimize the number of  cases involving unlawful possession
of a controlled substance constituting a drug enforcement misdemeanor  as described in
section 35, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, filed in an applicant’s jurisdiction;
(C) Programs that result  in satisfactory rates of successful outcomes for program par-
ticipants;
(D) Programs that prioritize the funding  of positions that interact directly with pro-
spective and enrolled program participants;
(E) Programs in rural areas that create regional partnerships; and
(F) Programs that adhere  to documented standards and best practices established by the
commission for deflection programs.
(7)(a) Grant funds awarded under this section may be used for:
(A) Deflection program expenses, including but not limited to law enforcement employees,  dep-
uty district attorneys and behavioral health,  case management or outreach workers, including peer
navigators and mobile crisis and support services workers.
(B) Behavioral health workforce development.
(C) Capital construction of behavioral health treatment infrastructure.
(D) The payment of restitution to a victim,  if potential or outstanding restitution is a barrier to
program participation.
(E) The purchase  of closed-loop referral technology to facilitate referrals to local partners and
community-based organizations involved in supporting deflection and jail reentry programs.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the commission may award planning grants
for the development of deflection programs.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 14
(c) A county or county consortium applicant may request  up to 10 percent of program funds for
administrative costs. A tribal government or tribal government consortium  applicant may request
up to the federally negotiated indirect cost rate for the applicant to cover administrative costs.
(8) The commission shall provide staff support to the grant program.
(9) The commission [ may] shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions  of this section, including:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants;
(b) A process for distributing any unallocated funds;
(c) A process for evaluating the efficacy of deflection programs funded under this section;
(d) Provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant awards; and
(e) Provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between applicants.
(10) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Successful outcome” means an outcome that recognizes that recovery  pathways are neces-
sarily individual and that is measured  in engagement in case management services and improve-
ments in quality of life stability factors and public safety.
(b) “Victim” has the meaning given that term in ORS 131.007.
SECTION 9a.
If Senate Bill 236 becomes law, section 9 of this 2025 Act (amending section
76, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024) is repealed and section 76, chapter  70, Oregon Laws 2024,
as amended by section  27, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 236), and
section 8b of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
Sec. 76.  (1) As  used in this section, “deflection program” means a collaborative program be-
tween law enforcement agencies and behavioral  health entities or community-based social service
organizations that assists individuals who may have  substance use disorder, another behavioral
health disorder or co-occurring disorders, and who often have other service needs,  to create
community-based pathways  to treatment, recovery support services, housing, case management or
other services.
(2) The Oregon Behavioral Health Deflection Program  is established within the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission. The program consists of  grants awarded by the commission to counties and
federally recognized tribal governments to fund deflection programs.
(3) The purpose of the program described in this section is to:
(a) Address the need for more deflection  programs to assist individuals whose behavioral health
conditions, including substance use disorder, and other service needs  lead to a heightened likelihood
of interactions with law  enforcement, incarceration, conviction and other engagement with the
criminal justice system.
(b) Track and report data concerning deflection program outcomes in order to determine the
best practices for deflection programs within this state.
(4)(a) The commission shall develop a grant application process for  awarding grants under this
section.
(b) An application for a grant under this section may be submitted by a county or designee  of
a county, a tribal government or designee of a tribal government or a consortium  consisting of two
or more counties or tribal  governments, or designee of a consortium. Only one application per
county or tribal government may be submitted, but the  application may request funding multiple
programs within an applicant’s jurisdiction.
(c) Prior to submitting  an application for a grant under this section, the applicant shall coordi-
nate with all partners of the development and administration of the proposed deflection program to
ensure that the partners have the resources necessary to implement the deflection program  as fol-
lows:
(A) For a county or county  consortium applicant, the partners shall include at least a district
attorney, a law enforcement agency,  a community mental health program established under ORS
430.620 and a provider from a Behavioral Health Resource Network established  under ORS 430.389.
Partners may also include a treatment provider, a local mental health  authority, a tribal govern-
ment, a peer support organization, a court or a local government body.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 15
(B) For a tribal government or tribal  government consortium applicant, the partners shall in-
clude at least a law enforcement agency and either a behavioral health entity or  a community-based
social service organization.
(d) An application for a grant under this section must contain:
(A) A description of the coordination with program partners required by  paragraph (c) of this
subsection that has occurred;
(B) A  description of the individuals who would be eligible for the program and what qualifies
as a successful  outcome, formulated in cooperation with the program partners described in para-
graph (c) of this subsection;
(C) For a county or  county consortium applicant, a description of how the program for which
the applicant is  seeking funding is culturally and linguistically responsive, trauma-informed and
evidence-based;
(D) For a county or county consortium applicant, a description of a plan to address language
access barriers when communicating program referral options and  program procedures to non-
English speaking individuals; and
(E) A description of how the program coordinator will communicate  with program partners
concerning persons participating in the program and any  other matter necessary for the adminis-
tration of the program.
(5) To be eligible for funding under this section, a deflection program:
(a) Must be coordinated by or in consultation with  a community mental health program, a local
mental health authority or a federally recognized tribal government;
(b) Must have a coordinator with the following program coordinator duties:
(A) Convening deflection program partners as needed for the operation of the program;
(B) Managing grant program funds awarded under this section; and
(C) Tracking and reporting data required by the commission  under section 37, chapter 70,
Oregon Laws 2024;
(c) Must involve the partners described in subsection (4)(c) of this section; and
(d) May involve a partnership with one or more of the following entities:
(A) A first responder agency other than a law enforcement agency;
(B) A community provider;
(C) A treatment provider;
(D) A community-based organization;
(E) A case management provider;
(F) A recovery support services provider; or
(G) Any other individual or entity deemed necessary by the program  coordinator to carry out
the purposes of the deflection program, including  individuals with lived experience with substance
use disorder, a behavioral health disorder or co-occurring disorders.
(6)(a) The commission shall distribute moneys in the Oregon Behavioral  Health Deflection Pro-
gram Account established under section 78, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, as follows:
(A) The commission shall first determine the  proportion of funds available to an applicant that
is a federally recognized tribal government or  a consortium of federally recognized tribal govern-
ments.
(B) Following the determination made under subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph, the remaining
moneys shall be distributed to other applicants as follows:
(i) Twenty-five percent of the moneys shall  be distributed to counties [ based on the county for-
mula share used  for the program during the biennium ending June 30, 2025 ] based on the formula
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection ;
(ii) Seventy percent of the moneys shall be distributed to  counties based on [ the formula de-
scribed in paragraph (b) of this subsection ] a competitive grant program adopted by  the com-
mission by rule and following the priorities described in paragraph (c) of this subsection ;
(iii) Three percent  of the moneys shall be retained by the commission to support grant recipient
data collection and analysis or evaluation of outcome measures; and
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 16
(iv) Two percent of  the moneys shall be retained by the commission to support technical as-
sistance for grant recipients.
[(C) Each qualifying county applicant shall receive a grant award of no less than $300,000. ]
(b) For purposes of the distribution under paragraph [ (a)(B)(ii)] (a)(B)(i)  of this subsection:
(A) The commission shall provide historical data to each applicant  to assist applicants in de-
veloping a program population projection.
(B) Applicants shall develop a program population  projection to submit to the commission. The
program population projection shall consist of:
(i) A projection of individuals eligible for deflection based on local program criteria;
(ii) A projection of  individuals to be enrolled in the Oregon Behavioral Health Deflection Pro-
gram within the applicant’s local jurisdiction; and
(iii) An explanation describing the methodology used to calculate  the program population
projection.
(C) The proportion of  funds available to an applicant shall be determined by the commission
using the combined projections of  potential populations served by the Oregon Behavioral Health
Deflection Program , but a qualifying applicant may not receive less than $150,000 .
(c) The commission  shall prioritize the following when awarding grants under paragraph
(a)(B)(ii) of this subsection:
(A) Grant recipients making adequate progress toward meeting program population
projections submitted to the commission under paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(B) Programs designed to minimize  the number of cases involving unlawful possession
of a controlled substance  constituting a drug enforcement misdemeanor as described in
section 35, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, filed in an applicant’s jurisdiction;
(C) Programs that result in satisfactory rates of successful outcomes  for program par-
ticipants;
(D) Programs that prioritize the funding of positions  that interact directly with pro-
spective and enrolled program participants;
(E) Programs in rural areas that create regional partnerships; and
(F) Programs that adhere  to documented standards and best practices established by the
commission for deflection programs.
(7)(a) Grant funds awarded under this section may be used for:
(A) Deflection  program expenses, including but not limited to law enforcement employees, dep-
uty district attorneys and behavioral health, case management  or outreach workers, including peer
navigators and mobile crisis and support services workers.
(B) Behavioral health workforce development.
(C) Capital construction of behavioral health treatment infrastructure.
(D) The payment of restitution to a victim,  if potential or outstanding restitution is a barrier to
program participation.
(E) The purchase of closed-loop referral technology to facilitate referrals to local  partners and
community-based organizations involved in supporting deflection and jail reentry programs.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the commission may award planning grants
for the development of deflection programs.
(c) A county or county consortium applicant may request  up to 10 percent of program funds for
administrative costs. A tribal  government or tribal government consortium applicant may request
up to the federally negotiated indirect cost rate for the applicant to cover administrative costs.
(8) The commission shall provide staff support to the grant program.
(9) The commission [ may] shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions  of this section, including:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants;
(b) A process for distributing any unallocated funds;
(c) A process for evaluating the efficacy of deflection programs funded under this section;
(d) Provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant awards; and
(e) Provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between applicants.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 17
(10) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Successful outcome” means an outcome that recognizes that recovery  pathways are neces-
sarily individual and that is measured  in engagement in case management services and improve-
ments in quality of life stability factors and public safety.
(b) “Victim” has the meaning given that term in ORS 131.007.
SECTION 10.
(1) The amendments to section 76,  chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, by section
9 of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2027.
(2) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  may adopt rules and take any other action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the commission, on and after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section,
to exercise all of the  powers, duties and functions conferred on the commission by the
amendments to section 76, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, by section 9 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 10a.
(1) The repeal of section 9 of this 2025 Act (amending section 76, chapter
70, Oregon Laws 2024) by section 9a of this 2025  Act and the amendments to section 76,
chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, by section 9a of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2027.
(2) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission may adopt rules  and take any other action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the commission, on and after the  operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,
to exercise all of the powers, duties and functions conferred on  the commission by the
amendments to section 76, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, by section 9a of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 11.
 Section 77, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 77.  [ (1)(a)] (1) The [ Improving People’s Access to  Community-based Treatment, Supports and
Services Grant Review Committee established under ORS 430.234, in cooperation with the ] Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission [ and the  Oregon Health Authority, ] shall monitor the progress of and
evaluate program outcomes for applicants that receive grant funds as part  of the Oregon Behavioral
Health Deflection Program established under section 76 , [ of this 2024 Act ] chapter  70, Oregon
Laws 2024.
[(b) The committee shall share with the commission any data  described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection that the commission requires to carry  out the commission’s duties under section 37 of this
2024 Act. ]
(2) Beginning no later than [ September 30,] November 1,  2025, the [ committee] commission shall
annually report, in the manner described in ORS 192.245 [ and in conjunction with the report required
under ORS 430.245 (3) ], the  findings of the evaluation described in subsection (1) of this section to
the relevant interim committees of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 12.  Section 37, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 37.  (1) The  Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall establish a statewide system for
tracking simple, clear and  meaningful data concerning deflection program outcomes, including con-
nections to social services and criminal justice system avoidance,  and other data deemed relevant
that is timely and easily accessed to inform best practices and  improve outcomes for individual
program participants.
[(2)(a) No later than 12 months after the  effective date of this 2024 Act, the commission shall con-
duct a study to determine  best practices for deflection programs and make recommendations for funding
of the Oregon Behavioral Health Deflection Program described in section 76 of this 2024  Act. In
making the recommendations described in this  paragraph, the commission shall consider the best
available information and projections regarding deflection programs in this state. ]
[(b)] (2) No later than [ 18 months after the effective date of this 2024 Act ] February 1, 2027 , the
commission shall develop standards and  best practices for deflection programs in this state based
on information received from the programs and pursuant to sections 76 and 77 , [ of this 2024 Act ]
chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024 .
(3) The commission  shall maintain a list of deflection programs operating within this state, and
shall make the list publicly available on the website of the commission.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 18
(4) As used in this  section, “deflection program” means a collaborative program between law
enforcement  agencies  and behavioral health entities  or community-based social service organ-
izations that assists individuals who may have  substance use disorder, another behavioral health
disorder or co-occurring disorders,  and who often have other  service needs,  to create
community-based pathways  to treatment, recovery support services, housing, case management or
other services.
SECTION 13.  Section 75, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 75.  (1) For purposes of tracking racial or other  demographic disparities in enforcement, the
Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission shall collect and analyze the following data concerning de-
flections, arrests, charges and convictions  for unlawful possession of a controlled substance and
delivery of a controlled substance offenses:
(a) The date and location of each deflection and arrest;
(b) The specific offense for which each person was arrested, charged or convicted; and
(c) Demographic data for each person deflected, arrested, charged or convicted.
(2) Beginning no later than [ August 31, 2025 ] February 1, 2026 , [ and annually thereafter, ] the
commission shall [ provide a report to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the
judiciary, in the manner described in  ORS 192.245, containing ] make the results of  an analysis of
the data described in this section  available to the public  in a clear and accessible format, either
in a report or on the website of the commission .
(3) In carrying out  the commission’s duties under this section, the commission may use any in-
formation concerning deflections  obtained as part of carrying out the duties of the commission under
section 37 , [ of this 2024  Act ] chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024,  or as part of the grant program ap-
plication, monitoring and evaluation process described in sections 76 and 77 , [ of this 2024 Act ]
chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024 .
(4) Data reported under this section shall be used only  for statistical purposes and not for any
other purpose. The data reports may not contain information that reveals the  identity of any indi-
vidual. Data collected by government agencies or  held by the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
under this section  that may reveal the identity of any individual is exempt from public disclosure
in any manner.
(5) The  Oregon Criminal Justice Commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this
section.
(IMPACTS Program)
SECTION 14.
 ORS 430.231 is amended to read:
430.231. (1) The Improving People’s Access to Community-based Treatment, Supports and  Ser-
vices Program is established in recognition of the shortage  of comprehensive community supports
and services for individuals with  mental health or substance use disorders, leading to their in-
volvement with the criminal justice  system, hospitalizations and institutional placements. The pur-
pose of the program is to address this need by awarding grants to counties  and Oregon’s federally
recognized Indian tribes to establish evidence-based and  tribal-based programs to provide the needed
supports and services.
(2) The [ Improving People’s Access to Community-based Treatment, Supports and  Services Grant
Review Committee established in ORS 430.234 ] Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  shall  adopt
rules for administering the program, including rules:
(a) Identifying the target  population of people with frequent criminal justice involvement and
behavioral health conditions to be served by the programs funded with the grants;
(b) Prescribing a methodology for  the [ committee] commission  to review and approve grant ap-
plications  and award grants ;
(c) Establishing program or service outcome measures;
(d) Establishing criteria for allowing a [ grantee] grant recipient  to use a grant  or a portion of
a grant to:
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 19
(A) Expand the workforce of providers of mental health or substance abuse services  in the
community; or
(B) Provide permanent, supportive housing for individuals with mental health or substance use
disorders;  [ and]
[(e) Allowing the committee to terminate an agreement with an  entity that fails to meet the grant
requirements or has been found to  have misused funds or committed fraud. The ability to meet the
grant requirements may be a consideration in future funding or the amount of funding. ]
(e) Establishing a process for distributing any unallocated funds;
(f) Establishing a process for evaluating the efficacy of programs and services funded  by
the grant program;
(g) Establishing provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant
awards; and
(h) Establishing provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between applicants.
(3) The [ committee] commission  shall  allocate funds in the Improving People’s Access to
Community-based Treatment, Supports and Services Account established in ORS 430.233 to
[grantees] grant recipients . The funds may not be  used for a purpose other than the programs
providing supports and services for which the grants were awarded.
(4) The commission shall designate a percentage of the funds to be set  aside and awarded
to at least one federally recognized Indian tribe.
[(4)] (5) If unallocated funds remain at the conclusion of the grant acceptance period,  the [ com-
mittee] commission  may establish a supplemental grant period and distribute the unallocated  funds
to the counties or Oregon’s federally recognized Indian tribes that received grants.
[(5)] (6)  Up to 20 percent of the funds in the account may  be used for operating a statewide
program to support the design and implementation of community-based services, including but not
limited to:
(a) Technical assistance to prospective [ grantees] grant recipients  in developing proposals,
particularly for developing proposals for supportive housing;
(b) Technical assistance to  [ grantees] grant recipients  for troubleshooting data collection re-
quirements and sharing information with third parties as necessary for carrying out the programs;
(c) Statewide training, provided in-person and remotely, for [ grantees and  nongrantees ] grant
recipients and others , focused on improving outcomes for the target population;
(d) Making resources available to district attorneys and defense attorneys for consultation on
cases involving defendants with complex behavioral health issues;
(e) Developing or strengthening a centralized system to  make available to communities practi-
tioners in professional specialties for which there is a shortage,  including practitioners of addiction
medicine and psychiatry; and
(f) [A one-time investment in ] Creating or operating  information technology  systems  to  support
the data system needs  for the evaluation, accountability and innovation components of the program.
[(6)(a)] (7)(a)  The [ committee] commission  shall procure and enter into contracts for goods,
services and personal services related to the creation, operation,  maintenance and management of
information technology systems for the purpose of carrying out this section.
(b) The [ committee shall] commission may  procure and enter into contracts for goods,  services
and personal  services related to designing, developing, conducting, performing and completing re-
search, review, audits, statistical analyses, investigations, studies, reports  and evaluations for the
purpose of carrying out this section.
[(7)] (8) Three percent of the funds in the account must be used to support outcome measures,
evaluation or both.
[(8)] (9) An application for a grant must be  submitted by [ the] a federally recognized Indian tribe
or [ the local public safety coordinating council on behalf of the ] a county and:
(a) Must include:
[(A) Letters of support and commitments from community leaders or  organizations that are not
members of the local public safety coordinating council, including but not limited to: ]
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 20
[(i) Agencies working with homeless individuals; ]
[(ii) Behavioral health care providers; ]
[(iii) Coordinated care organizations; and ]
[(iv) Local hospitals. ]
[(B)] (A)  For applications from counties, a report of the input from the local federally recognized
Indian tribes and, to the extent feasible, an explanation of how the input was incorporated  into the
design of the program, supports and services.
[(C)] (B)  For applications from federally  recognized Indian tribes, a report of the input from the
[local public safety coordinating council ] county  and, to the extent feasible,  an explanation of how
the input was incorporated into the design of the program, supports and services.
[(D)] (C) An agreement to screen all participants receiving supports and services  funded by the
grants for potential eligibility for medical assistance and to  assist eligible participants to apply for
medical assistance, including an agreement for a process  for sharing data and protecting the
confidentiality of recipients among the program participants.
[(E)] (D)  A process for program partners, participating jails and hospitals to:
(i) Provide information upon admission or at intake about the  potential risks and benefits of
tribal notification; and
(ii) Offer tribal members  the opportunity to disclose their statuses and situations to the federally
recognized Indian tribe of their choosing.
(b) May include a request to have  more flexibility in using existing state funding to provide
supports and services that address the need described in subsection (1) of this section.
(c) May include letters of support and commitments  from community leaders or organ-
izations, including but not limited to:
(A) Agencies working with homeless individuals;
(B) Behavioral health care providers;
(C) Coordinated care organizations; and
(D) Local hospitals.
[(9)] (10) [ Annually, grantees ] Grant recipients  shall report  to the [ committee and to the Oregon
Health Authority the medical assistance enrollment  data in addition to other ] commission on  outcome
measures or evaluation metrics collected as  part of the grant for participants receiving supports and
services provided with funds from the grants.
(11) Data reported by grant recipients under this section shall be used  only for statistical
purposes and not for any other purpose. Data reports  may not contain information that re-
veals the identity of any individual. Data collected by grant recipients or government  agen-
cies or held by the commission under this section that may reveal the identity of  any
individual is exempt from public disclosure in any manner.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 430.233 is amended to read:
430.233. The Improving People’s Access  to Community-based Treatment, Supports and Services
Account is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. All
moneys in the  account are continuously appropriated to the [ Improving People’s Access to
Community-based Treatment, Supports and Services  Grant Review Committee ] Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission for the purpose of carrying out ORS 430.231.
SECTION 16.  ORS 430.238 is amended to read:
430.238. (1) The [ Improving People’s Access to  Community-based Treatment, Supports and Services
Grant Review Committee established in  ORS 430.234 ] Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  shall
administer a program in  which Oregon counties, Oregon’s federally recognized Indian tribes or re-
gional consortia of counties or  Indian tribes may apply to the [ committee] commission  for state
funds for the investments made by the counties, Indian tribes or consortia in comprehensive com-
munity supports and services for the target population  of the Improving People’s Access to
Community-based Treatment, Supports and Services Program, for the  purpose of enhancing or sus-
taining the supports and services.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 21
(2) The [ committee shall ] commission may  establish priorities for the  funds based on  results
from outcome measures or evaluation tools or  specified factors such as the size of the  popu-
lation of a county, the utilization of the Oregon State Hospital by the residents of  the county and
the availability of permanent, supportive housing units.
(3) The [ committee] commission  may provide enhanced funds to encourage regional program
projects.
(4) The local investments matched by state  funds may not be used to supplant existing sources
of funding that could be used to provide supports and services to the  target population, including
but not limited to:
(a) Medical assistance funding;
(b) Federal grants;
(c) Local funding;
(d) State grants or other state funding; or
(e) Other third-party sources of funding to reimburse the cost of the supports and services.
(5) The county, tribal or regional investment used to leverage a state match may include:
(a) County government or tribal funds.
(b) Financial commitments by entities other than counties or Oregon’s federally  recognized
tribes that are specifically designated for  providing Improving People’s Access to Community-based
Treatment, Supports and Services Program supports and services.
(c) The value of newly dedicated or donated real  estate or other tangible property, including but
not limited to:
(A) Land;
(B) Buildings;
(C) Remodeling costs that  address the needs identified by the Improving People’s Access to
Community-based Treatment, Supports and Services Program;
(D) Donated program space;
(E) Vehicles; or
(F) Interest on loans specific to housing,  treatment facilities or related construction for the
target population.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 430.243 is amended to read:
430.243. The [ Improving People’s Access to Community-based Treatment,  Supports and Services
Grant Review Committee established in ORS 430.234 ] Oregon Criminal Justice Commission and the
Oregon Health Authority  may work together to include coordinated care organizations in the Im-
proving People’s Access to Community-based Treatment, Supports and Services Program,  as permit-
ted by state and federal law, in a  way that provides incentives for coordinated care organizations
to provide comprehensive  community supports and services, as defined in ORS 430.230, to their
members who have mental health or  substance use disorders and be appropriately reimbursed for
the costs of the supports and services.
SECTION 18.  ORS 430.245 is amended to read:
430.245. [ (1) At least once per biennium, the Improving People’s Access  to Community-based
Treatment, Supports and Services Grant Review Committee shall, in conjunction with the  Oregon
Health Authority, identify: ]
[(a) The costs to state government that were avoided as a result  of the Improving People’s Access
to Community-based Treatment, Supports and Services Program established in ORS 430.231; and ]
[(b) Any increased costs to local governments as a result of the program. ]
[(2) No later than January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the committee shall submit a  report to the
Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245, that includes the costs described in
subsection (1) of this section and describes the methodology employed by the  committee in determining
the costs. ]
[(3) Annually,  the committee ] The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  shall  annually submit
a report, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245,  on the outcome measures or the results of evalu-
ations of  the [ program] Improving People’s Access to Community-based Treatment, Supports
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 22
and Services Program established in  ORS 430.231  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to health and the judiciary and to the Governor.
SECTION 19. ORS 430.234, 430.235 and 430.236 are repealed.
(Treatment Court Grants)
SECTION 20.  ORS 423.150 is amended to read:
423.150. (1) The Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Provide appropriate treatment  services to [ drug-addicted] persons with substance use dis-
order who are  in the  custody of the department [ who are at a high or medium risk of reoffending ]
and who have moderate to severe treatment needs; and
[(b) Make grants to counties in order to provide supplemental funding for: ]
[(A) The operation of local jails; ]
[(B) Appropriate treatment services for drug-addicted persons on probation,  parole or post-prison
supervision;  or ]
[(C) The  intensive supervision of drug-addicted persons on probation, parole or post-prison super-
vision, including the incarceration of drug-addicted persons  who have violated the terms and conditions
of probation, parole or post-prison supervision. ]
[(2) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  shall make grants to counties in order to provide
supplemental funding for drug courts  for drug-addicted persons, including the costs of appropriate
treatment services and the incarceration of  persons who have violated the terms and conditions of a
drug court.]
[(3)(a) The appropriate legislative committee shall periodically conduct  oversight hearings on the
effectiveness of this section. ]
[(b) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall periodically conduct independent  evaluations
of the programs funded by this section for their effectiveness in reducing criminal behavior in a cost-
effective manner and shall report the findings to the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission. ]
[(4)] (b) [The Department of Corrections shall ] Determine which persons are eligible for treatment
under this  subsection [ (1)(a) of this section ] using an actuarial risk assessment tool.
[(5) The department shall adopt  rules to administer the grant program described in subsection
(1)(b) of this section. ]
[(6) Prior to adopting the rules described in subsection (5) of this  section, the department shall
consult with a broad-based committee that includes representatives of: ]
[(a) County boards of commissioners; ]
[(b) County sheriffs; ]
[(c) District attorneys; ]
[(d) County community corrections; ]
[(e) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission; ]
[(f) Presiding judges of the judicial districts of this state; ]
[(g) Public defenders; and ]
[(h) Treatment providers. ]
[(7) In determining which grant proposals to fund within each county, the department shall: ]
[(a) Consult with the committee described in subsection (6) of this section; ]
[(b) Give priority to those  proposals  that are best designed to reduce crime and drug addiction;
and]
[(c) Be  guided by evidence-based and tribal-based practices, risk assessment tools or other
research-based considerations.]
[(8)] (2) Nothing in this section:
(a) Creates any claim, right of action or civil liability; or
(b) Requires a supervisory authority or the Department of Corrections to provide treatment to
any individual under the authority’s supervision or in the custody of the department.
[(9) As used in this section: ]
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 23
[(a) “Drug-addicted person” means a person who has lost the ability to  control the personal use
of controlled substances, cannabis or alcohol, or who  uses controlled substances, cannabis or alcohol
to the extent that the health of the person or that of others is substantially impaired or endangered or
the social or  economic function of the person is substantially disrupted. A drug-addicted person may
be physically dependent, a condition in which the body  requires a continuing supply of a controlled
substance, cannabis or alcohol to  avoid characteristic withdrawal symptoms, or psychologically de-
pendent, a condition characterized by an overwhelming mental desire for continued  use of a controlled
substance, cannabis or alcohol. ]
[(b) “Intensive supervision” means the active monitoring of a person’s performance  in a treatment
program by a  parole and probation officer and the imposition of sanctions, or request to a court for
sanctions, if the person fails to abide by the terms and conditions of a treatment program. ]
SECTION 20a.
If House Bill 2632 becomes law, section 11, chapter 151, Oregon  Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 2632) (amending ORS 423.150), is repealed.
SECTION 21. (1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall establish  the Oregon
Treatment Court Grant Program to award grants to counties in order  to provide supple-
mental funding for treatment courts. The  grants must support the adherence of treatment
courts to the standards developed under ORS 137.680  and may fund the costs of appropriate
treatment services and the incarceration of persons who have violated the terms and condi-
tions of the treatment court.
(2) The commission may adopt rules to administer the grant program described in this
section, including:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants;
(b) A process for distributing any unallocated funds;
(c) A process for evaluating the efficacy of treatment courts funded under this section;
(d) Provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant awards; and
(e) Provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between applicants.
(3) As used in this section, “treatment court” means a  specialty court as defined in ORS
137.680, including a drug court program as defined in ORS 3.450.
SECTION 21a.
 If House Bill 2632 becomes law, section 21 of this 2025  Act is amended to read:
Sec. 21.  (1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall establish the Oregon Treatment
Court Grant Program to award grants to counties  in order to provide supplemental funding for
treatment courts. The grants must support the adherence  of treatment courts to the standards de-
veloped under ORS 137.680 and may fund the  costs of appropriate treatment services and the
incarceration of persons who have violated the terms and conditions of the treatment court.
(2) The commission  may adopt rules to administer the grant program described in this section,
including:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants;
(b) A process for distributing any unallocated funds;
(c) A process for evaluating the efficacy of treatment courts funded under this section;
(d) Provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant awards; and
(e) Provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between applicants.
(3) As used in this section, [ “treatment court” means a specialty court as defined ] “treatment
courts” has the meaning given that term  in ORS 137.680[ , including a drug  court program as
defined in ORS 3.450 ].
SECTION 21b.
The amendments to section 21 of this 2025 Act by section 21a of this 2025
Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
SECTION 22. The Oregon Treatment Court Grant Program  Account is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. All moneys in the account are
continuously appropriated to the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of ORS 137.656 (3)(d) and 423.150 (2).
SECTION 22a.  Section 22 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 24
Sec. 22.  The Oregon Treatment Court Grant Program  Account is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. All moneys  in the account are continuously
appropriated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission for the purpose of carrying  out the pro-
visions of [ ORS 137.656 (3)(d) and 423.150 (2) ] section 21 of this 2025 Act .
SECTION 22b. The amendments to section 22 of this 2025 Act by section 22a of this 2025
Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
LAW ENFORCEMENT-FOCUSED GRANT PROGRAMS
(General Provisions)
SECTION 23. (1) The Oregon Law Enforcement Grant  Program is established within the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission to support local law enforcement in Oregon.
(2) The Oregon Law Enforcement Grant Program consists of grants awarded to cities and
counties by the commission in the following program areas:
(a) The Organized Retail Theft Grant Program established under ORS 137.686;
(b) The Illegal Marijuana Market Enforcement Grant  Program established under ORS
475C.531;
(c) The Oregon Jail-Based Medications for Opioid Use  Disorder Grant Program estab-
lished under section 82, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024; and
(d) Any other grant programs administered by the commission that  provide funding
consistent with the goals described in this section.
(3) If any of  the program areas listed in subsection (2) of this section include eligible
applicants other than cities and counties:
(a) Grants may not be awarded to those entities using  the procedures described in this
section.
(b) The commission shall, prior to releasing the solicitation for applications for  the
Oregon Law Enforcement Grant Program, select the proportion of funds  to be set aside for
applicants other than cities and counties.
(4)(a) During a grant application  period established by the commission, the proportion
of grant funds available to each city and  county shall be determined in accordance with the
statutory requirements for each program area listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Eligibility criteria,  funding priorities and permitted uses of funds established by
statute for each program area listed in subsection (2) of this section apply to grants  to cities
and counties under this section.
(5)(a) The commission shall adopt rules to administer the Oregon  Law Enforcement
Grant Program. At a minimum, the rules must include:
(A) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants;
(B) A process for distributing any unallocated funds;
(C) A  process for evaluating the efficacy of programs funded by the Oregon Law
Enforcement Grant Program;
(D) Provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant awards; and
(E) Provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between cities and counties.
(b) For grants in program areas listed in subsection (2) of this  section for which entities
other than cities and counties may apply, any rules  adopted by the commission pursuant to
the statute establishing the specific  program area shall govern the grant application and
award process for those applicants.
(c) For city and county applicants, any rules adopted by the  commission pursuant to the
statute establishing the  specific program area, including rules establishing definitions or re-
lated to  eligibility criteria, funding priorities and permitted uses of funds, generally apply
unless in conflict with this section or a rule adopted pursuant to this section.
(6) Cities and counties may  request up to 10 percent of program funds for administrative
costs.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 25
(7) As used in this  section, “administrative costs” means all costs incurred in the ad-
ministration of the Oregon Law  Enforcement Grant Program that are not directly related
to the delivery of program services or projects.
(Organized Retail Theft Grant Program)
SECTION 24.  ORS 137.686 is amended to read:
137.686. (1) The Organized Retail Theft Grant Program is established to assist:
(a) Cities and counties with the costs incurred by local law enforcement agencies  in addressing
organized retail theft; and
(b) The Department of [ State Police ] Justice with costs incurred by the department in addressing
organized retail theft[ ; and ].
[(c) Community-based organizations in addressing organized retail theft. ]
(2) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall administer the grant  program described in
subsection (1) of this section and shall award the grants described in this section.
(3) The  commission [ shall] may  adopt rules to administer the grant program[ . Rules adopted
under this section must include ], including:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants; [ and]
(b) A process for distributing any unallocated funds;
[(b)] (c)  A process for evaluating the efficacy of programs and services funded by  the grant
program[.];
(d) Provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant awards; and
(e) Provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between applicants.
(4) Moneys distributed to grant recipients under this section must  be spent on costs associated
with addressing and prosecuting organized  retail theft  and may be used for the purchase of
equipment.
[(5) The commission shall establish three categories of grants under this section as follows: ]
[(a) Grants awarded, on a competitive basis, to cities and counties; ]
[(b) Grants awarded, on a competitive basis, to community-based organizations; and ]
[(c) Grants awarded to the department. ]
(5) As used in this section, “equipment” means any  item used by peace officers, deputy
district attorneys or retail  asset protection investigators in detecting, investigating, docu-
menting or adjudicating organized retail theft activities.
SECTION 25.
The Organized Retail Theft  Grant Program Account is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. All moneys in the account are
continuously appropriated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of ORS 137.686.
(Illegal Marijuana Market Enforcement Grant Program)
SECTION 26.  ORS 475C.531 is amended to read:
475C.531. (1) The Illegal Marijuana Market Enforcement Grant Program is established to assist
cities and counties with the costs incurred by local law enforcement  agencies and community-based
organizations in addressing unlawful marijuana cultivation or distribution operations.
(2) The Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission shall administer the grant program described in
subsection (1) of this section and shall award the grants described in this section.
(3) The commission [ shall] may  adopt rules to administer the grant program[ . Rules  adopted
under this section must include ], including:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants; [ and]
(b) A process for distributing any unallocated funds;
[(b)] (c)  A process for evaluating the efficacy of  [ local law enforcement ] programs and services
funded by the grant program[ .];
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 26
(d) Provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant awards; and
(e) Provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between applicants.
(4) Moneys distributed to grant recipients  under this section must be spent on costs associated
with addressing and prosecuting unlawful marijuana cultivation or distribution operations.
(5) The commission shall prioritize the following when awarding grants under this section:
(a) Providing financial assistance to local law enforcement agencies and district  attorneys in
rural areas of this state to address unlawful marijuana cultivation or distribution operations;
(b) Supporting  local law enforcement agencies and district attorneys in investigating and pros-
ecuting large-scale unlawful marijuana cultivation or distribution operations;
(c) Providing financial assistance to local law  enforcement agencies and district attorneys in the
investigation and prosecution of organized  crime involved in unlawful marijuana cultivation or dis-
tribution operations;
(d) Providing financial assistance to local  law enforcement agencies and district attorneys in the
investigation and prosecution of unlawful  marijuana cultivation or distribution operations that di-
vert marijuana outside of this state; and
(e) Providing financial assistance to local law enforcement agencies  and community-based or-
ganizations in order to address the ongoing humanitarian crisis associated with  unlawful marijuana
cultivation or distribution operations and to facilitate connections to  any necessary assistance and
services for individuals impacted by the humanitarian crisis, including but  not limited to language
translation services and housing and legal assistance.
(Jail-Based Medications for Opioid Use Disorder Grant Program)
SECTION 27.
 Section 81, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 81.  As used in [ sections 81 to 86  of this 2024 Act ] section 82, chapter 70, Oregon Laws
2024:
(1) “Commission” means the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(2) “Local correctional facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 169.005.
(3) “Tribal correctional facility” means a jail or prison in Oregon that  is operated by a federally
recognized tribe and confines persons for more than 36 hours.
SECTION 28.
 Section 82, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 82.  (1) The Oregon Jail-Based Medications for  Opioid Use Disorder Grant Program is es-
tablished in the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission to provide opioid use disorder treatment  and
transition planning services to  persons in custody in local correctional facilities and tribal
correctional facilities.
(2) The commission, in collaboration with the Oregon Health Authority, shall  administer the
grant program. At minimum, the commission and authority shall collaborate to provide grant  recip-
ients support with technical assistance and best practices.
(3) The commission shall award  grants to cities and counties in Oregon that operate a
local correctional facility and  to federally recognized tribes in Oregon that operate a tribal
correctional facility.
(4) At  least 10 percent of total moneys awarded to grant recipients must be awarded to
local correctional facilities in rural areas, as defined by the  commission by rule, or tribal
correctional facilities. If any amount of the 10 percent is not awarded during  an initial ap-
plication cycle, the remaining amount may be  awarded to any otherwise eligible local
correctional facility or tribal correctional facility under a supplemental application cycle.
(5) The commission may enter a contract with a third party to provide  statewide tech-
nical assistance to grant recipients.
(6) The commission shall consider geographic equity when awarding grant funds.
(7) Moneys awarded to grant recipients under this section may be used to:
(a) Provide medication, telemedicine or any  other reasonable treatment to persons in
custody with an opioid use disorder.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 27
(b) Develop or operate mobile or nonmobile opioid treatment units.
(c) Administer screenings for opioid use disorder or risk of acute withdrawal.
(d) Facilitate transition planning services for persons in custody who  seek or receive
opioid use disorder treatment.
(e) Undertake any other  actions reasonably calculated to mitigate operational or struc-
tural barriers to providing opioid use disorder treatment in  local correctional facilities or
tribal correctional facilities, including but  not limited to mitigating any lack of secure stor-
age for medication.
(8) The commission shall adopt rules necessary to administer the program  described in
this section. The rules, at minimum, must:
(a) Establish a methodology  for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding
grants;
(b) Establish a process for distributing any unallocated funds;
(c) Establish a process for evaluating the  efficacy of programs and services funded by the
grant program;
(d) Establish  provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant
awards;
(e) Establish provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between applicants;
(f) Require applicants to submit a statement acknowledging that any grant funds re-
ceived must be expended in accordance with  the allowable uses described in subsection (7)
of this section;
(g) Require applicants to submit a letter of commitment from each administrator  of a
local correctional facility or tribal correctional facility who is associated with the application,
committing to participate in good faith in the grant program; and
(h) Define “rural” for purposes of this section.
SECTION 29.
 Section 87, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 87.  (1) The Oregon Jail-Based Medications for Opioid  Use Disorder Fund is established in
the State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon
Jail-Based Medications for Opioid Use Disorder Fund shall be credited to the fund. The fund consists
of moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Oregon Criminal Justice Commis-
sion for the purposes of carrying out sections 81  [to 86 of this 2024 Act ] and 82, chapter 70, Oregon
Laws 2024.
SECTION 30.
Sections 83, 84, 85 and 86, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, are repealed.
NOTE: Sections 31 and  32 were deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renum-
bered.
OREGON CRIMINAL JUSTICE COMMISSION CHANGES
SECTION 33.  ORS 137.654 is amended to read:
137.654. (1) There is established the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  consisting of [ nine]
12 members[. The Governor shall appoint seven  members who are subject to confirmation by the Senate
pursuant to section  4, Article III of the Oregon Constitution. The President of the Senate shall appoint
one state  Senator as a nonvoting member. The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint
one state Representative  as a nonvoting member. Members serve at the pleasure of the appointing au-
thority. The Governor shall  appoint members of the commission consistent with the following: ] as fol-
lows:
(a) The Governor shall appoint the following nine  members who are subject to confir-
mation by the Senate pursuant to Article III, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution:
(A) One member who is an elected district attorney  recommended to the Governor by a
statewide nonprofit organization representing Oregon district attorneys.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 28
(B) One member  who is a defense attorney recommended to the Governor by a statewide
nonprofit organization representing Oregon criminal defense attorneys.
(C) One member who is a county sheriff  or chief of police recommended to the Governor
by a statewide nonprofit organization representing Oregon sheriffs or chiefs of police.
(D) One member who is a community corrections director who is not a sheriff,  recom-
mended to the Governor by a statewide nonprofit organization representing Oregon commu-
nity corrections directors.
(E) One  member who is a county commissioner recommended to the Governor by a
statewide organization representing Oregon county commissioners.
(F) One member with experience providing community-based treatment for persons  with
substance use disorder or a behavioral health condition.
(G) One member who is associated with  an academic institution and who has research
experience in criminal justice or a related field.
(H) One member who is a representative of a qualified victim services  program, recom-
mended to the Governor by  a statewide nonprofit organization whose purpose is to support
qualified victim services programs, as defined in ORS 147.600.
(I) One member who is a representative of  a community-based organization that provides
reentry or  social services to underserved racial, ethnic or minority communities, recom-
mended to the  Governor by an organization that advocates for services that support persons
convicted of crimes and families and communities of crime survivors.
(b) The President of the Senate shall appoint one Senator as a nonvoting member.
(c) The Speaker of the House of  Representatives shall appoint one Representative as a
nonvoting member.
(d) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint a  representative of the Judicial
Department as a nonvoting member.
(2) The  Governor shall appoint commission members in accordance with the following
principles:
(a) Members shall be appointed  with consideration of geographic, racial, ethnic and gender di-
versity  and lived experience in the criminal justice system .
(b) Not more than [ four] half of the  members may belong to the same  political party. Party af-
filiation is determined by the appropriate entry on official election registration cards.
[(2)(a)] (3)(a)  The term of office of each  member is four years or until the end of a legislative
member’s legislative term, whichever occurs first. Before the expiration of the  term of a member,
the appointing authority shall appoint a  successor whose term begins immediately upon the expira-
tion of the term of the current member. A member is  eligible for reappointment but may serve no
more than two consecutive terms.
(b) In case of a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall appoint a  person to fill
the office for the  unexpired term. When a person is appointed under this paragraph, the unexpired
term may not be considered for purposes of the limitation to two consecutive terms of service.
[(3)] (4)  The Governor shall  appoint one of the commissioners as chairperson, to serve at the
pleasure of the Governor. The members  of the commission shall elect from among themselves a vice
chairperson who shall preside over meetings and exercise the functions of the chairperson  during
absence or disability of the chairperson. The  chairperson and vice chairperson shall execute the
duties determined by the commission to be necessary.
[(4)] (5)  The chairperson shall appoint one member, subject to the approval of the  commission,
to serve on an executive  committee with the chairperson and vice chairperson. The executive com-
mittee may exercise  the powers and responsibilities of the commission between meetings of the
commission. All action taken by the executive  committee not previously authorized must be sub-
mitted to the commission for approval at the next regular or special meeting.
[(5)] (6)  A majority of the voting members of the commission  constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 29
[(6)] (7)  The commission shall meet at least once a month, at a time and  place determined by
the commission. The commission shall also meet at such other times and  places as are specified by
the call of the chairperson. If a majority of members, in writing, request a special meeting, the
chairperson shall designate a time for a special meeting as requested.
[(7)] (8)  The Governor shall appoint an executive director for the commission who shall  be in
the exempt service and  who shall be responsible for the performance of duties assigned by the
commission. Subject  to the State Personnel Relations Law, the executive director may employ ap-
propriate staff to carry out the duties assigned by the commission.
[(8)] (9) Members of the commission  are entitled to expenses as provided in ORS 292.495. Subject
to the availability of funds, members of a committee established under ORS 137.658  who are not
commission members may be reimbursed for actual and necessary  travel and other expenses in-
curred by them in the performance  of their official duties, subject to ORS 292.495 (2). Any legislative
members are  entitled to payment of compensation and expense reimbursement under ORS 171.072,
payable from funds appropriated to the Legislative Assembly.
[(9)] (10) The commission is subject to the provisions of ORS 291.201 to 291.222 and 291.232  to
291.260.
[(10)] (11) The commission shall consult with and seek advice and counsel of the Chief Justice
of the Supreme Court and the State Court  Administrator on any matter that impacts the operation
of the courts. The Chief Justice may have a representative participate in  any meeting of the com-
mission.
SECTION 34.
A person who is a member  of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission on
the effective date of this 2025 Act must be  permitted to complete the member’s current term
and, if otherwise eligible under ORS 137.654 (3), is eligible for reappointment.
SECTION 35. Section 34 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 36.  ORS 137.656 is amended to read:
137.656. (1) The purpose of the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission is to improve the effec-
tiveness and efficiency of state and local criminal justice systems by providing a centralized  and
impartial forum for statewide policy development and planning.
(2) The primary  duty of the commission is to develop and maintain a state criminal justice policy
and comprehensive, long-range  plan for a coordinated state criminal justice system that encompasses
public safety, offender  accountability, crime reduction and prevention and offender treatment and
rehabilitation. The plan must include, but need not be limited to, recommendations regarding:
(a) Capacity, utilization and type of state and local prison and jail facilities;
(b) Implementation of community corrections programs;
(c) Alternatives to the use of prison and jail facilities;
(d) Appropriate use of existing facilities and programs;
(e) Whether additional or different facilities and programs are necessary;
(f) Methods of assessing the effectiveness of juvenile and adult correctional programs,  devices
and sanctions in reducing future criminal conduct by juvenile and adult offenders;
(g) Methods of reducing the risk of future criminal conduct; and
(h) The effective utilization of local public safety coordinating councils.
(3) Other duties of the commission are:
(a) To conduct joint studies by agreement with other state agencies, boards , [ or] commissions
or Oregon Health and Science University on any matter within the jurisdiction of the commission.
(b) To provide Oregon criminal justice analytical and statistical information  to federal agencies
and serve as a clearinghouse and information center for the collection, preparation,  analysis and
dissemination of information on state and local sentencing practices.
(c) To provide technical assistance and support to local public safety coordinating councils.
[(d) To receive grant applications to start or expand drug court programs  as defined in ORS 3.450,
to make rules to govern the grant process and to award grant funds according to the rules. ]
[(e)] (d)  To  prepare the racial and ethnic impact statements described in ORS 137.683 and
137.685.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 30
[(f)] (e)  To assess the extent  to which each county is reducing racial and ethnic disparities in
its correctional population.
(4) The commission shall establish by rule the information that must be submitted under ORS
137.010 (9) and  the methods for submitting the information. A rule adopted under this subsection
must be approved by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court before it takes effect.
(5) The commission may:
(a) Apply for and receive gifts and grants from any public or private source.
(b) Award grants from funds appropriated by the Legislative Assembly  to the commission or
from funds otherwise available from any other source, for the purpose of carrying out the duties  of
the commission.
(c) Adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this subsection.
SECTION 36a.
If House Bill 2632 becomes law, section 10, chapter 151, Oregon  Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 2632) (amending ORS 137.656), is repealed.
HOUSE BILL 3194 (2013) CHANGES
SECTION 37. ORS 475.934 is repealed.
SECTION 37a. Notwithstanding section 11, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 236) (amending ORS 475.934), if Senate Bill 236 becomes law, ORS 475.934  is re-
pealed by section 37 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 38. Section 8, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section 22, chapter
78, Oregon Laws 2022, and section 3, chapter 572, Oregon Laws 2023, is repealed.
SECTION 39. Section 12, chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017, as  amended by section 7, chapter 572,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 12.  [ (1)] The amendments to ORS  137.717 and 421.168 by sections 4 and 5, chapter 673,
Oregon Laws 2017,  and the repeal of section 16, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, by section 3,
chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017, become operative on January 1, 2018.
[(2) The amendments to ORS  137.717 by section 6, chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017, become opera-
tive on July 1, 2033. ]
SECTION 40. Section 13, chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017, as  amended by section 8, chapter 572,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  (1) The amendments to  section 1, chapter 830, Oregon Laws 2015, by section 2, chapter
673, Oregon Laws 2017, apply to sentences imposed on or after August 8, 2017.
(2) The amendments to ORS 137.717 and 421.168 by sections 4 and 5, chapter 673,  Oregon Laws
2017, apply to sentences imposed on or after January 1, 2018.
[(3) The amendments to ORS 137.717 by section 6, chapter 673, Oregon Laws  2017, apply to sen-
tences imposed on or after July 1, 2033. ]
SECTION 41.  ORS 137.717, as amended by section 7, chapter 649, Oregon Laws  2013, section
6, chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017, and section 3, chapter 151, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended  to
read:
137.717. (1) When a court sentences a person convicted of:
(a) Aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057, organized retail theft under  ORS
164.098, burglary in the first degree under ORS 164.225[ , robbery in the third degree under ORS
164.395] or aggravated identity  theft under ORS 165.803, the presumptive sentence is 24 months of
incarceration, unless the rules of the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission prescribe a longer
presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree  under ORS 164.057, organized
retail theft under ORS 164.098, burglary in the first degree under ORS  164.225, robbery in the third
degree under ORS 164.395, robbery in the second degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the  first
degree under ORS 164.415 or aggravated identity theft under ORS 165.803;
(B) Two or more previous convictions for any combination of the crimes  listed in subsection (2)
of this section; or
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 31
(C) A previous conviction for a crime listed in subsection (2) of  this section, if the current crime
of conviction was committed while the defendant was on supervision for the previous  conviction or
less than  three years after the date the defendant completed the period of supervision for the pre-
vious conviction.
(b) Unauthorized use of  a vehicle under ORS 164.135, mail theft or receipt of stolen mail under
ORS 164.162, burglary in  the second degree under ORS 164.215, criminal mischief in the first degree
under ORS 164.365, computer crime under ORS 164.377,  robbery in the third degree under ORS
164.395, forgery in the first degree under ORS 165.013, criminal possession  of a forged instrument
in the first degree under ORS  165.022, fraudulent use of a credit card under ORS 165.055 (4)(b),
possession of a stolen vehicle  under ORS 819.300 or trafficking in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310,
the presumptive sentence is 18  months of incarceration, unless the rules of the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission prescribe a longer presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree  under ORS 164.057, organized
retail theft under ORS 164.098, unauthorized use of a  vehicle under ORS 164.135, burglary in the
first degree under ORS 164.225,  robbery in the third degree under ORS 164.395, robbery in the sec-
ond degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the first degree under ORS 164.415, possession  of a stolen
vehicle under ORS 819.300, trafficking  in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310 or aggravated identity
theft under ORS 165.803;
(B) Two or more previous convictions for any combination of the crimes  listed in subsection (2)
of this section; or
(C) A previous conviction for a crime listed in subsection (2) of  this section, if the current crime
of conviction was  committed while the defendant was on supervision for the previous conviction or
less than three years after the date the defendant completed the period of supervision for the  pre-
vious conviction.
(c) Theft in the first degree under ORS 164.055 or  identity theft under ORS 165.800, the
presumptive sentence is 13  months of incarceration, unless the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission prescribe a longer presumptive sentence, if the person has:
(A) A previous conviction for aggravated theft in the first degree  under ORS 164.057, organized
retail theft under ORS 164.098, unauthorized use of a  vehicle under ORS 164.135, burglary in the
first degree under ORS  164.225, robbery in the second degree under ORS 164.405, robbery in the first
degree under ORS 164.415,  possession of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300, trafficking in stolen
vehicles under ORS 819.310 or aggravated identity theft under ORS 165.803; or
(B) Four or more previous convictions for any  combination of crimes listed in subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) The crimes to which subsection (1) of this section applies are:
(a) Theft in the second degree under ORS 164.045;
(b) Theft in the first degree under ORS 164.055;
(c) Aggravated theft in the first degree under ORS 164.057;
(d) Organized retail theft under ORS 164.098;
(e) Unauthorized use of a vehicle under ORS 164.135;
(f) Mail theft or receipt of stolen mail under ORS 164.162;
(g) Burglary in the second degree under ORS 164.215;
(h) Burglary in the first degree under ORS 164.225;
(i) Criminal mischief in the second degree under ORS 164.354;
(j) Criminal mischief in the first degree under ORS 164.365;
(k) Computer crime under ORS 164.377;
(L) Forgery in the second degree under ORS 165.007;
(m) Forgery in the first degree under ORS 165.013;
(n) Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the second degree under ORS 165.017;
(o) Criminal possession of a forged instrument in the first degree under ORS 165.022;
(p) Fraudulent use of a credit card under ORS 165.055;
(q) Identity theft under ORS 165.800;
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 32
(r) Possession of a stolen vehicle under ORS 819.300;
(s) Trafficking in stolen vehicles under ORS 819.310; and
(t) Any attempt to commit a crime listed in this subsection.
(3)(a) A presumptive sentence described in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section shall be in-
creased by two months for each previous conviction the person has that:
(A) Was for any of the crimes listed in subsection (1) or (2) of this section; and
(B) Was not used as a predicate for the presumptive sentence described in subsection (1)(a)  or
(b) of this section.
(b) Previous convictions may not increase a presumptive sentence described in subsection  (1)(a)
or (b) of this section by more than 12 months under this subsection.
(4) The court may impose a sentence other than the sentence provided by subsection (1)  or (3)
of this section if the court imposes:
(a) A longer term of incarceration that is otherwise required or authorized by law; or
(b) A departure  sentence authorized by the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
based upon findings of substantial  and compelling reasons. Unless the law or the rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission allow for imposition of a longer sentence, the maximum  departure al-
lowed for a person sentenced under this subsection  is double the presumptive sentence provided in
subsection (1) or (3) of this section.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4)(b) of this section,  the court may not sentence a person under
subsection (4) of this section to a term of incarceration that exceeds the period  of time described
in ORS 161.605.
(6) The court shall sentence a person under this section to at least  the presumptive sentence
described in subsection (1)(a) or  (b) or (3) of this section, unless the parties stipulate otherwise or
the court finds that:
(a) The person was not on probation, parole or post-prison supervision for a crime listed  in
subsection (1) of this section at the time of the commission of the current crime of conviction;
(b) The person has  not previously received a downward departure from a presumptive sentence
for a crime listed in subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The harm or loss caused by the crime is not greater than usual for that type of crime; and
(d) In consideration of the nature of the offense and  the harm to the victim, a downward de-
parture will:
(A) Increase public safety;
(B) Enhance the likelihood that the person will be rehabilitated; and
(C) Not unduly reduce the appropriate punishment.
(7) When the court imposes  a sentence of probation for a conviction for theft in the first degree
or identity theft or under subsection (6)  of this section, the supervisory authority as defined in ORS
144.087 may require the person  to receive a high level of supervision for at least 12 months, and
may extend the period of high-level supervision for all or part of the remaining probationary term.
(8)(a) For a crime committed on or after November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered to  have
occurred upon the pronouncement of sentence in open  court. However, when sentences are imposed
for two or more convictions arising out  of the same conduct or criminal episode, none of the con-
victions is considered to have occurred prior to any of the other convictions arising out  of the same
conduct or criminal episode.
(b) For a  crime committed prior to November 1, 1989, a conviction is considered to have oc-
curred upon the pronouncement in open court of a sentence or upon the pronouncement  in open
court of the suspended imposition of a sentence.
(9) For purposes of this section, previous convictions must be proven pursuant to ORS 137.079.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) “Downward departure” means a downward dispositional departure or  a downward durational
departure under the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(b) “Previous conviction” includes:
(A) Convictions occurring before, on or after July 1, 2003; and
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 33
(B) Convictions entered in any other state or federal court for comparable offenses.
SECTION 42.
(1) Section 33, chapter 649, Oregon Laws  2013, as amended by section 24,
chapter 78, Oregon Laws 2022, and section 5, chapter 572, Oregon Laws 2023, is repealed.
(2) Section 38,  chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section 25, chapter 78,
Oregon Laws 2022, and section 6, chapter 572, Oregon Laws 2023, is repealed.
SECTION 43.  ORS 40.015, as amended by section  37, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is
amended to read:
40.015. (1) The Oregon Evidence Code applies to all courts in this state except for:
(a) A hearing or mediation before a magistrate of the Oregon Tax Court as  provided by ORS
305.501;
(b) The small claims department of a circuit court as provided by ORS 46.415; and
(c) The small claims department of a justice court as provided by ORS 55.080.
(2) The Oregon  Evidence Code applies generally to civil actions, suits and proceedings, criminal
actions  and  proceedings and to contempt proceedings except those in which the court may act
summarily.
(3) ORS 40.225 to 40.295 relating to privileges apply at all stages  of all actions, suits and pro-
ceedings.
(4) ORS 40.010 to 40.210 and 40.310 to 40.585 do not apply in the following situations:
(a) The determination of questions of fact preliminary to admissibility of evidence  when the is-
sue is to be determined by the court under ORS 40.030.
(b) Proceedings before grand juries, except as required by ORS 132.320.
(c) Proceedings for extradition, except as required by ORS 133.743 to 133.857.
(d) Sentencing proceedings, except proceedings under  ORS 138.052 and 163.150, as required by
ORS 137.090 or proceedings under ORS 136.765 to 136.785.
(e) Proceedings to revoke probation, except as required by ORS 137.090.
(f) Proceedings conducted in a reentry court under section 29, chapter  649, Oregon Laws
2013.
[(f)] (g)  Issuance of warrants of arrest, bench warrants or search warrants.
[(g)] (h)  Proceedings  under ORS chapter 135 relating to conditional release, security release,
release on personal recognizance, or preliminary hearings, subject to ORS 135.173.
[(h)] (i) Proceedings to determine proper disposition of a child in accordance with ORS  419B.325
(2) and 419C.400 (4).
[(i)] (j)  Proceedings  under ORS 813.210, 813.215, 813.220, 813.230, 813.250 and 813.255 to deter-
mine whether a driving  while under the influence of intoxicants diversion agreement should be al-
lowed or terminated.
[(j)] (k)  Proceedings under ORS 147.530 relating to victims’ rights, except for the provisions of
ORS 40.105 and 40.115.
SECTION 44.
 ORS 144.096, as amended by section 35, chapter 649,  Oregon Laws 2013, section
2, chapter 40, Oregon Laws 2017, section 2,  chapter 438, Oregon Laws 2017, and section 27, chapter
213, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
144.096. (1)(a) The  Department of Corrections shall prepare a proposed release plan for an adult
in custody and submit the proposed release plan  to the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison
Supervision prior to the release.
(b) If the proposed release plan is not approved by the board, the  board shall return the plan
to the department with its recommended modifications. The  department shall submit a revised plan
to the board prior to the release.
(c) If the revised plan is not acceptable to the board, the board shall determine the provisions
of the final plan prior to the release.
(d) The department, in consultation with the  board, shall by rule establish deadlines by which
a proposed release plan  described in paragraph (a) of this subsection and a revised plan described
in paragraph (b) of this subsection must be submitted to the board prior to release.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 34
(e) If an adult in custody was sentenced under section 29, chapter  649, Oregon Laws 2013,
and the release plan recommends that the adult  in custody participate in a reentry court,
the board shall provide a copy of the release plan to the reentry court.
(2) The local supervisory authority that is responsible for correctional services for an adult in
custody shall prepare  a proposed release plan for the adult in custody prior to the release from jail.
The local supervisory authority shall approve the release plan under its rules. If the adult in
custody was sentenced under section 29,  chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, and the supervisory
authority recommends that the adult in custody  participate in a reentry court, the supervi-
sory authority shall provide a copy of the release plan to the reentry court.
(3) A release plan prepared under subsection (1) or (2) of this section must include:
(a) A description of support services and program opportunities available  to the adult in cus-
tody, including any transitional housing or treatment programs to which the adult in custody has
been accepted;
(b) The recommended conditions of post-prison supervision;
(c) The level of supervision  that shall be consistent with the risk assessment classification of the
adult in custody;
(d) Any other conditions and requirements as may be necessary to promote public safety;
(e) For all adults in custody whose sentence to make restitution under ORS  137.106 has been
suspended for the term of imprisonment, a restitution payment schedule; and
(f) Any conditions necessary to assist the reformation of the adult in custody.
SECTION 45.
 ORS 144.101, as amended  by section 34, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, is
amended to read:
144.101. (1) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision has jurisdiction  over the
imposition of conditions of post-prison supervision and sanctions for violations of those  conditions
for a person convicted of a felony if:
(a) The term of imprisonment imposed on the person is more than 12 months;
(b) The felony is classified as crime category 8, 9, 10 or  11 of the sentencing guidelines grid of
the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission;
(c) The person is subject to a sentence under ORS 137.700 or 137.707;
(d) The person is sentenced as a dangerous offender under ORS 161.725 and 161.737;
(e) The person is subject to a term of post-prison supervision under ORS 144.103;
(f) The person is committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections under  ORS 137.124;
(g) The responsibility for correctional services for the person  has reverted to the department
under ORS 423.483; or
(h) No local supervisory authority  is responsible for correctional services for the person under
the laws of this state.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, a local  supervisory authority has juris-
diction over the imposition of conditions of post-prison supervision and sanctions for violations of
those conditions for a person sentenced to a term of imprisonment of 12 months or less.
(3) If a local supervisory authority imposes conditions of  post-prison supervision or sanctions for
violations of those conditions, the person  may request the board to review the conditions or sanc-
tions. The board shall review the request  and may, at its discretion, review the conditions and
sanctions, under rules adopted by the board.
(4) If a  circuit court in a participating county, as defined in section 29, chapter 649,
Oregon Laws 2013, enters an order admitting a person into a reentry court under section  29
(3), chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, the reentry court  has concurrent jurisdiction over the
imposition of sanctions for violations of the conditions of post-prison supervision.
[(4)] (5)  Nothing in this section  affects the jurisdiction of the board over the imposition of con-
ditions of parole and sanctions for violations of those conditions.
SECTION 46.
 ORS 144.106, as amended by section 36, chapter  649, Oregon Laws 2013, is
amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 35
144.106. (1) Except as otherwise provided  by rules of the Department of Corrections and the
State Board of  Parole and Post-Prison Supervision concerning parole and post-prison supervision
violators, the supervisory authority shall use a continuum of administrative  sanctions for violations
of the conditions of post-prison supervision.
(2) The sanction continuum shall include adjustments to the level of supervision and, as ap-
proved by the board or the local supervisory authority  that imposed the initial conditions of post-
prison supervision:
(a) Modification of or additions to the conditions of supervision; and
(b) Any other appropriate available local sanctions including, but not limited to, jail,  community
service work, house arrest, electronic  surveillance, restitution centers, work release centers, day
centers or other local sanctions established by agreement with the supervisory authority.
(3) An  offender may not be confined in a restitution center, work release center or jail for more
than 15 days for a violation of conditions of post-prison supervision unless:
(a) The Department of Corrections, county corrections agency or supervisory  authority imposes
a local sanction under subsection (1) of this section; [ or]
(b) A reentry court imposes a local sanction under section 29, chapter 649, Oregon Laws
2013; or
[(b)] (c)  The  board or its designated representative initiates a hearing for the purpose of im-
posing a sanction under ORS 144.107 or 144.108.
(4) A hearing before the board is not required if the department, a county corrections agency ,
[or] the supervisory authority  or  the court  imposes a local sanction under subsection (3) of this
section.  However,  the board may conduct a hearing under the procedures in ORS 144.343 and
144.347 and  impose a different sanction on the offender than that imposed by the department, a
county corrections agency , [ or] the supervisory authority  or the court .
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 47.
 ORS 430.230 is amended to read:
430.230. As used in [ ORS 430.230 to  430.236 ] this  section and ORS 430.231, 430.238  and
430.243:
(1) “Comprehensive community supports and services” includes:
(a) Community-based mental health or substance use disorder treatment programs;
(b) Community restoration services as defined in ORS 161.355;
(c) Evidence-based and tribal-based programs designed to reduce hospital and  jail utilization by
target populations; and
(d) Programs  aimed at diverting individuals with nonperson criminal charges experiencing men-
tal illness or substance use disorders from the criminal justice system.
(2) “County” includes a single county or a regional consortium of counties.
SECTION 48.
 Section 1, chapter 80, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) The Oregon Health Authority, in consultation with counties and  community mental
health programs, shall conduct a study to determine the funding required for each community mental
health program to provide the services and perform the functions required by law  related to indi-
viduals with behavioral health disorders in the following age groups:
(a) Newborns through youth 17 years of age;
(b) Ages 18 through 25; and
(c) Ages 26 and older.
(2) The study must include, but is not limited to, the costs of  providing the services and per-
forming the functions described in:
(a) ORS 161.315 to 161.351, 161.355 to 161.371, 161.385 to 161.395 and 161.505 to 161.585.
(b) ORS 426.005 to 426.390, 426.510 to 426.680, 426.701 and 426.702.
(c) ORS 430.021,  430.210, 430.230 , [ to 430.236 ] 430.231, 430.233 , 430.265 to 430.380, 430.397 to
430.401, 430.405 to 430.565 and 430.610 to 430.880 except ORS 430.630.
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 36
(d) ORS 430.627, 430.628, 430.629 and 430.630.
(3) The authority shall  compile a report of the authority’s findings about the costs of providing
the services and performing the functions described in the sections listed in:
(a) Subsection (2)(a), (b) and (d) of this section and make  the report available on the authority’s
website no later than January 1, 2025, and every five years thereafter; and
(b) Subsection (2)(c) of this section and make the report available on the authority’s  website no
later than January 1, 2026, and every five years thereafter.
SECTION 49.
 Section 1,  chapter 80, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 3, chapter 80,
Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1)  The Oregon Health Authority, in consultation with counties and community mental
health programs, shall conduct a study to determine the funding required for each community mental
health program to provide  the services and perform the functions required by law related to indi-
viduals with behavioral health disorders in the following age groups:
(a) Newborns through youth 17 years of age;
(b) Ages 18 through 25; and
(c) Ages 26 and older.
(2) The study must include, but  is not limited to, the costs of providing the services and per-
forming the functions described in:
(a) ORS 161.315 to 161.351, 161.355 to 161.371, 161.385 to 161.395 and 161.505 to 161.585.
(b) ORS 426.005 to 426.390, 426.510 to 426.680, 426.701 and 426.702.
(c) ORS 430.021, 430.210, 430.230 , [ to 430.236 ] 430.231, 430.233 , 430.265 to 430.380,  430.397 to
430.401, 430.405 to 430.565 and 430.610 to 430.880 except ORS 430.630.
(d) ORS 430.627, 430.628, 430.629 and 430.630.
(3) The authority shall compile reports  of the authority’s findings about the costs of providing
the services and performing the functions described in subsection (2) of this section every five  years
and make the reports available on the authority’s website.
OPERATIVE DATES
SECTION 50.
(1) Sections 1, 7, 21  and 23 of this 2025 Act, the amendments to ORS 137.656,
423.150, 430.230, 430.231, 430.233, 430.238, 430.243, 430.245 and 475C.531 and sections 52 and 53,
chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, sections  81, 82 and 87, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, and
section 1, chapter 80, Oregon Laws 2024,  by sections 2, 3, 14 to 18, 20, 26 to 29, 36 and 47 to
49 of this 2025 Act, and the repeal  of ORS 430.234, 430.235 and 430.236 and section 56, chapter
649, Oregon Laws 2013,  sections 4, 5 and 7, chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2018, and sections 83,
84, 85 and 86, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, by sections 5, 6, 19 and 30 of this  2025 Act be-
come operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  may adopt rules and take any other action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the commission, on and after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section,
to exercise all of the powers, duties and functions conferred on the  commission by sections
1, 7,  21 and 23 of this 2025 Act, the amendments to ORS 137.656, 423.150, 430.230, 430.231,
430.233, 430.238, 430.243, 430.245 and 475C.531 and sections 52 and 53, chapter 649, Oregon Laws
2013, sections 81, 82 and 87, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, and section  1, chapter 80, Oregon
Laws 2024, by sections 2, 3, 14 to 18, 20, 26 to 29, 36 and 47 to 49 of this 2025 Act,  and the
repeal of ORS 430.234, 430.235 and 430.236 and section 56,  chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013,
sections 4, 5  and 7, chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2018, and sections 83, 84, 85 and 86, chapter 70,
Oregon Laws 2024, by sections 5, 6, 19 and 30 of this 2025 Act.
APPLICABILITY
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 37
SECTION 51. Sections 1, 7, 21 and 23  of this 2025 Act, the amendments to ORS 137.656,
423.150, 430.230, 430.231, 430.233, 430.238, 430.243, 430.245 and 475C.531 and sections  52 and 53,
chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, sections 81, 82 and 87, chapter  70, Oregon Laws 2024, and
section 1, chapter 80, Oregon Laws 2024, by sections 2, 3, 14 to 18, 20, 26  to 29, 36 and 47 to
49 of this 2025 Act, and the repeal  of ORS 430.234, 430.235 and 430.236 and section 56, chapter
649, Oregon Laws 2013,  sections 4, 5 and 7, chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2018, and sections 83,
84, 85 and 86, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024,  by sections 5, 6, 19 and 30 of this 2025 Act apply
to grants that the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission first advertises or otherwise solicits
on or after July 1, 2026.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 52. The unit captions  used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 53. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 16, 2025
Repassed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3069 (HB 3069-C) Page 38